Thank you for joining me today.

This was going to be a speech on Hillary Clinton and how bad a President, especially in these times of Radical Islamic Terrorism, she would be.

Even her former Secret Service Agent, who has seen her under pressure and in times of stress, has stated that she lacks the temperament and integrity to be president.

There will be plenty of opportunity to discuss these important issues at a later time, and I will deliver that speech soon.

But today there is only one thing to discuss: the growing threat of terrorism inside of our borders.

The attack on the Pulse Nightclub in Orlando, Florida, was the worst terrorist strike on our soil since September 11th, and the worst mass shooting in our country’s history.

So many people dead, so many people gravely injured, so much carnage, such a disgrace.

The horror is beyond description.

The families of these wonderful people are totally devastated. Likewise, our whole nation, and indeed the whole world, is devastated.

We express our deepest sympathies to the victims, the wounded, and their families.

We mourn, as one people, for our nation’s loss – and pledge our support to any and all who need it.

I would like to ask now that we all observe a moment of silence for the victims of the attack.

[SILENCE]

Our nation stands together in solidarity with the members of Orlando’s LGBT Community.

This is a very dark moment in America’s history.

A radical Islamic terrorist targeted the nightclub not only because he wanted to kill Americans, but in order to execute gay and lesbian citizens because of their sexual orientation.

It is a strike at the heart and soul of who we are as a nation.

It is an assault on the ability of free people to live their lives, love who they want and express their identity.

It is an attack on the right of every single American to live in peace and safety in their own country.

We need to respond to this attack on America as one united people – with force, purpose and determination.

But the current politically correct response cripples our ability to talk and think and act clearly.

If we don’t get tough, and we don’t get smart – and fast – we’re not going to have a country anymore — there will be nothing left.

The killer, whose name I will not use, or ever say, was born to Afghan parents who immigrated to the United States. His father published support for the Afghan Taliban, a regime which murders those who don’t share its radical views. The father even said he was running for President of that country.

The bottom line is that the only reason the killer was in America in the first place was because we allowed his family to come here.

That is a fact, and it’s a fact we need to talk about.

We have a dysfunctional immigration system which does not permit us to know who we let into our country, and it does not permit us to protect our citizens.

We have an incompetent administration, and if I am not elected President, that will not change over the next four years — but it must change, and it must change now.

With fifty people dead, and dozens more wounded, we cannot afford to talk around the issue anymore — we have to address it head on.

I called for a ban after San Bernardino, and was met with great scorn and anger but now, many are saying I was right to do so — and although the pause is temporary, we must find out what is going on. The ban will be lifted when we as a nation are in a position to properly and perfectly screen those people coming into our country.

The immigration laws of the United States give the President the power to suspend entry into the country of any class of persons that the President deems detrimental to the interests or security of the United States, as he deems appropriate.

I will use this power to protect the American people. When I am elected, I will suspend immigration from areas of the world when there is a proven history of terrorism against the United States, Europe or our allies, until we understand how to end these threats.

After a full, impartial and long overdue security assessment, we will develop a responsible immigration policy that serves the interests and values of America.

We cannot continue to allow thousands upon thousands of people to pour into our country, many of whom have the same thought process as this savage killer.

Many of the principles of Radical Islam are incompatible with Western values and institutions.

Radical Islam is anti-woman, anti-gay and anti-American.

I refuse to allow America to become a place where gay people, Christian people, and Jewish people, are the targets of persecution and intimidation by Radical Islamic preachers of hate and violence.

It’s not just a national security issue. It is a quality of life issue.

If we want to protect the quality of life for all Americans – women and children, gay and straight, Jews and Christians and all people – then we need to tell the truth about Radical Islam.

We need to tell the truth, also, about how Radical Islam is coming to our shores.

We are importing Radical Islamic Terrorism into the West through a failed immigration system — and through an intelligence community held back by our president.

Even our own FBI Director has admitted that we cannot effectively check the backgrounds of the people we are letting into America.

All of the September 11th hijackers were issued visas.

Large numbers of Somali refugees in Minnesota have tried to join ISIS.

The Boston Bombers came here through political asylum.

The male shooter in San Bernardino – again, whose name I won’t mention — was the child of immigrants from Pakistan, and he brought his wife – the other terrorist – from Saudi Arabia, through another one of our easily exploited visa programs.

Immigration from Afghanistan into the United States has increased nearly five-fold in just one year. According to Pew Research, 99% of people in Afghanistan support oppressive Sharia Law.

We admit many more from other countries in the region who share these same oppressive views.

If we want to remain a free and open society, then we have to control our borders.

Yet, Hillary Clinton – for months and despite so many attacks – repeatedly refused to even say the words “radical Islam,” until I challenged her yesterday to say the words or leave the race.

However, Hillary Clinton – who has been forced to say the words today after policies she supports have caused us so much damage – still has no clue what Radical Islam is, and won’t speak honestly about what it is.

She is in total denial, and her continuing reluctance to ever name the enemy broadcasts weakness across the world.

In fact, just a few weeks before the San Bernardino slaughter, Hillary Clinton explained her refusal to say the words Radical Islam. Here is what she said: “Muslims are peaceful and tolerant people, and have nothing whatsoever to do with terrorism.”

Hillary Clinton says the solution is to ban guns. They tried that in France, which has among the toughest gun laws in the world, and 130 were brutally murdered by Islamic terrorists in cold blood. Her plan is to disarm law-abiding Americans, abolishing the 2nd amendment, and leaving only the bad guys and terrorists with guns. She wants to take away Americans’ guns, then admit the very people who want to slaughter us.

I will be meeting with the NRA, which has given me their earliest endorsement in a Presidential race, to discuss how to ensure Americans have the means to protect themselves in this age of terror.

The bottom line is that Hillary supports the policies that bring the threat of Radical Islam into America, and allow it to grow overseas.

In fact, Hillary Clinton’s catastrophic immigration plan will bring vastly more Radical Islamic immigration into this country, threatening not only our security but our way of life.

When it comes to Radical Islamic terrorism, ignorance is not bliss – it’s deadly.

The Obama Administration, with the support of Hillary Clinton and others, has also damaged our security by restraining our intelligence-gathering and failing to support law enforcement. They have put political correctness above common sense, above your safety, and above all else.

I refuse to be politically correct.

I will do the right thing–I want to straighten things out and to Make America Great Again.

The days of deadly ignorance will end, and they will end soon.

As President I will give our intelligence community, law enforcement and military the tools they need to prevent terrorist attacks.

We need an intelligence-gathering system second to none. That includes better cooperation between state, local and federal officials – and with our allies.

I will have an Attorney General, a Director of National Intelligence, and a Secretary of Defense who will know how to fight the war on Radical Islamic Terrorism – and who will have the support they require to get the job done.

We also must ensure the American people are provided the information they need to understand the threat.

The Senate Subcommittee on Immigration has already identified hundreds of immigrants charged with terrorist activities inside the United States since September 11th.

Nearly a year ago, the Senate Subcommittee asked President Obama’s Departments of Justice, State and Homeland Security to provide the immigration history of all terrorists inside the United States.

These Departments refused to comply.

President Obama must release the full and complete immigration histories of all individuals implicated in terrorist activity of any kind since 9/11.

The public has a right to know how these people got here.

We have to screen applicants to know whether they are affiliated with, or support, radical groups and beliefs.

We have to control the amount of future immigration into this country to prevent large pockets of radicalization from forming inside America.

Even a single individual can be devastating, just look at what happened in Orlando. Can you imagine large groups?

Truly, our President doesn’t know what he is doing. He has failed us, and failed us badly, and under his leadership, this situation will not get any better — it will only get worse.

Each year, the United States permanently admits more than 100,000 immigrants from the Middle East, and many more from Muslim countries outside the Middle East. Our government has been admitting ever-growing numbers, year after year, without any effective plan for our security.

In fact, Clinton’s State Department was in charge of the admissions process for people applying to enter from overseas.

Having learned nothing from these attacks, she now plans to massively increase admissions without a screening plan, including a 500% increase in Syrian refugees.

This could be a better, bigger version of the legendary Trojan Horse.

We can’t let this happen.

Altogether, under the Clinton plan, you’d be admitting hundreds of thousands of refugees from the Middle East with no system to vet them, or to prevent the radicalization of their children.

The burden is on Hillary Clinton to tell us why she believes immigration from these dangerous countries should be increased without any effective system to screen who we are bringing in.

The burden is on Hillary Clinton to tell us why we should admit anyone into our country who supports violence of any kind against gay and lesbian Americans.

The burden is also on Hillary Clinton to tell us how she will pay for it. Her plan will cost Americans hundreds of billions of dollars long-term.

Wouldn’t this money be better spent on rebuilding America for our current population, including the many poor people already living here?

We have to stop the tremendous flow of Syrian refugees into the United States – we don’t know who they are, they have no documentation, and we don’t know what they’re planning.

What I want is common sense. I want a mainstream immigration policy that promotes American values.

That is the choice I put before the American people: a mainstream immigration policy designed to benefit America, or Hillary Clinton’s radical immigration policy designed to benefit politically-correct special interests.

We’ve got to get smart, and tough, and vigilant, and we’ve got to do it now, because later is too late.

Ask yourself, who is really the friend of women and the LGBT community, Donald Trump with his actions, or Hillary Clinton with her words? Clinton wants to allow Radical Islamic terrorists to pour into our country—they enslave women, and murder gays.

I don’t want them in our country.

The terrorist attack on the Pulse Night Club demands a full and complete investigation into every aspect of the assault.

In San Bernardino, as an example, people knew what was going on, but they used the excuse of racial profiling for not reporting it.

We need to know what the killer discussed with his relatives, parents, friends and associates.

We need to know if he was affiliated with any radical Mosques or radical activists and what, if any, is their immigration status.

We need to know if he travelled anywhere, and who he travelled with.

We need to make sure every single last person involved in this plan – including anyone who knew something but didn’t tell us – is brought to justice.

If it can be proven that somebody had information about any attack, and did not give this information to authorities, they must serve prison time .

America must do more – much more – to protect its citizens, especially people who are potential victims of crimes based on their backgrounds or sexual orientations.

It also means we must change our foreign policy.

The decision to overthrow the regime in Libya, then pushing for the overthrow of the regime in Syria, among other things, without plans for the day after, have created space for ISIS to expand and grow.

These actions, along with our disastrous Iran deal, have also reduced our ability to work in partnership with our Muslim allies in the region.

That is why our new goal must be to defeat Islamic terrorism, not nation-building.

For instance, the last major NATO mission was Hillary Clinton’s war in Libya. That mission helped unleash ISIS on a new continent.

I’ve said NATO needs to change its focus to stopping terrorism. Since I’ve raised that criticism, NATO has since announced a new initiative focused on just that.

America must unite the whole civilized world in the fight against Islamic terrorism, just like we did against communism in the Cold War.

We’ve tried it President Obama’s way. He gave the world his apology tour, we got ISIS, and many other problems, in return.

I’d like to conclude my remarks today by again expressing our solidarity with the people of Orlando who have come under attack.

When I am President, I pledge to protect and defend all Americans who live inside of our borders. Wherever they come from, wherever they were born, all Americans living here and following our laws will be protected.

America will be a tolerant and open society.

America will also be a safe society.

We will protect our borders at home.

We will defeat ISIS overseas.

We will ensure every parent can raise their children in peace and safety.

We will make America rich again.

We will make America safe again.

We will make American Great Again.

Thank you.

The media talks about “homegrown,” terrorism, but Islamic radicalism, and the networks that nurture it, are imports from overseas.

Yes, there are many radicalized people already inside our country as a result of the poor policies of the past. But the whole point is that it will be much, much easier to deal with our current problem if we don’t keep on bringing in people who add to the problem.

For instance, the controversial Mosque attended by the Boston Bombers had as its founder an immigrant from overseas charged in an assassination plot.

This shooter in Orlando was the child of an immigrant father who supported one of the most repressive regimes on Earth. Why would we admit people who support violent hatred?

Hillary Clinton can never claim to be a friend of the gay community as long as she continues to support immigration policies that bring Islamic extremists to our country who suppress women, gays and anyone who doesn’t share their views.

She can’t have it both ways. She can’t claim to be supportive of these communities while trying to increase the number of people coming in who want to oppress them.

How does this kind of immigration make our life better? How does this kind of immigration make our country better?

Why does Hillary Clinton want to bring people here—in vast numbers—who reject our values?

Immigration is a privilege, and we should not let anyone into this country who doesn’t support our communities – all of our communities.

America has already admitted four times more immigrants than any country on earth, and we continue to admit millions more with no real checks or scrutiny.

Not surprisingly, wages for our workers haven’t budged in many years.

So whether it’s matter of national security, or financial security, we can’t afford to keep on going like this. We owe $19 trillion in debt, and no longer have options.

All our communities, from all backgrounds, are ready for some relief. This is not an act of offense against anyone; it is an act of defense.

I want us all to work together, including in partnership with our Muslim communities. But Muslim communities must cooperate with law enforcement and turn in the people who they know are bad – and they do know where they are.

I want to fix our schools, roads, bridges and job market. I want every American to succeed. Hillary Clinton wants to empty out the Treasury to bring people into the country that include individuals who preach hate against our own citizens.

I want to protect our citizens – all of our citizens.

You know why they changed the rules? Because they saw how I was doing, and they didn't like it. Same thing in Florida. Now, I won Florida in a landslide, right? But they changed the rules so that the winner gets all, because they thought Jeb Bush was going to win. He's the former governor, or Marco Rubio was going to win.

And then all of a sudden, the first poll came out, and Trump was leading by a lot and they said, what are we going to do? What are we going to do? Because that was done so that I wouldn't get any delegates. Then I won in a landslide, and I got all the delegates. So sometimes it works to my advantage. But Colorado is unfortunate, because they disenfranchised the voters. They disenfranchised all of these voters in Colorado.

But, Anderson, we had delegates there, we had a lot of delegates, and they were not heard, because the Republican Party out there was 100 percent probably controlled by the RNC, which maybe doesn't like this happening because I'm a self-funder, I'm putting up my own money. They don't like when I put up my own money because it means they don't have any control of me, because I'm working for the people.

You know why the rules - I know the rules very well, but I know that it's stacked against me by the establishment. I fully understand it. We had people out there, and they weren't heard. And then, in fact, today, when it was announced - the numbers were announced, they put out something on Twitter saying, oh, we stopped Trump, essentially, we stopped Trump, we stopped - that was put out by the party in Colorado. The point is, it was stacked against us.

No, I don't think so.  Look, first of all, you and I watched Ted Cruz, and I watched him very strongly say, well, he's been winning, but, you know, I've won 22 states, and he's won 10, and we're really way up in votes, you know, in terms of the voters, which to me is very important, but it's never talked.  I'm millions of votes ahead of him, and as you know, I'm hundreds of delegates ahead of him, but the Colorado thing was very, very unfair.  And I thought Louisiana was very unfair.  I won Louisiana.  I won it easily.

I don't know.  I mean, I don't see it.  It's not like it's -- I have 15 miles of proof.  But certainly they should want to have a vote of the people of Colorado.  The people of Colorado -- I would have won.  I've won so many of the votes.  I mean, the voting has been phenomenal.  That's why I've won so many more states than Ted Cruz and Kasich.

Well, a lot of similarities.  In this case, I've won most of it.  I mean, you know, you can say about, what about organization?  Well, how come I'm leading by hundreds of delegates?  How come I'm leading by millions of votes?

Remember this:  I was supposed to lose South Carolina.  I was supposed to lose to Bush New Hampshire.  I was supposed to lose the entire South.  I won virtually everything in the South.  I look at your board, I mean, it's all my color, whatever that color is.  I guess it's sort of a semi-purple.  Not the nicest color, but that's OK.

But I won the entire South.  I won Florida.  I could say they have a bad organization, because Cruz was supposed to win Alabama, Arkansas.  He was supposed to win Kentucky.  He lost all of them.  He lost Florida.  The point is, I mean, if you talk about that, I can say, well, if my organization's not so good, how come I've won many more states than him and millions of votes more? Oh, we can figure it out.  But it's stacked against us.  I mean, you can have people that are totally against you.  How come my people went there, delegates, great delegates, they're all over the Internet now burning up their Republican card.

Because the Republican Party in Colorado wanted Cruz, or maybe they wanted somebody other than Trump.  I don't think anybody really wants Cruz.  Why would they want him?  There's no reason to want him.

But the Republican Party wanted somebody other than Trump.  And you know, the funny thing, I am the only one that's going to beat Hillary Clinton, assuming she runs, assuming she gets out of her problem, which she probably will, because that's a system that's bad, too.

I'll give you another example.  I'm no fan of Bernie Sanders, OK.  I'm no fan at all.  To me, he's -- you know, forget it.  But every time I turn on, he's winning, he's winning.  Every week after week, he wins, he wins, he wins, he wins.  And then I watch you and I watch all of the pundits, they say, but he can't win.  You know why?  It's stacked against him.  It really is.  It's stacked against him.  In his case, it's super-delegates.  In my case, it's the obvious.  But it's stacked against him.

Yeah, and everybody else flew town.  You know, Cruz left town.  He talked about New York values, like you and I and everybody else, we know about New York values, when we saw what happened with the World Trade Center and how incredible New York was.  So I think he left town.  I don't think he's going to come back.

But I'm winning New York.  I think I'll do great in New Jersey.  I'll do great in Pennsylvania.  I'll do great in Connecticut.  Rhode Island is great.  Maryland.  I mean, you know, I've got a lot of states where they know me.  The nice thing is the states that know me are the ones that I really do well in, like Florida.  They know me in Florida.  And I won in a landslide.

You know, when I talked about NATO last week, Wolf Blitzer asked me the question.  What about NATO?  Now, I've been building buildings all my life and doing deals all my life.  But I know about NATO.  And I said it's obsolete and we're spending too much and everyone is ripping us off.  You have 28 countries; they're ripping us off.  And it's obsolete, because we're looking at Soviet Union that doesn't even exist.  Russia's plenty strong.  But it doesn't cover terror.  And if it does cover terror, the wrong countries are in. I'm a business guy.  We're going to make great deals on trade.  We're going to do -- it's right in my wheelhouse.  It's so easy for me.  We're going have a really strong military.  We're going to rebuild our military.  We're going to take care of health care.  I'm going to do so well with so many different things.  But I do want -- you don't need two like me.  I want to have somebody that can deal with Congress, that gets along with Congress.  That's a Washington person.

I do.  I don't want to do that now.  I think it's inappropriate.  I just think it's the wrong time.  I do have people in mind.  I have a lot of people that -- look, I've been dealing in politics all my life.  I know most of these politicians.  I have great respect.



Thank you very much. It's great to be in a wonderful city - New York. And it's an honor to have everybody here.
Our country is in serious trouble.
Islamic terrorism is eating up large portions of the Middle East. The oil that, when we left Iraq, we should have taken, now ISIS has. And what they don't have, Iran has. I want to have the strongest military that we've ever had - and we need it more now than ever - but I said, "Don't hit Iraq. You're going to totally destabilize the Middle East. Iran is going to take over the Middle East. Iran - and somebody else - will get the oil."
We spent $2 trillion in Iraq. We lost thousands of lives. We have thousands and thousands of wounded soldiers. And every time we give Iraq equipment, the first time a bullet goes off in the air, they leave it. 2,300 Humvees were left behind for the enemy.
Last quarter - it was just announced - our gross domestic product was below zero. Our labor participation rate was the worst since 1978. And our real unemployment is anywhere from 18 to 20 percent. A lot of people can't get jobs. They can't get jobs because there are no jobs - because China has our jobs and Mexico has our jobs.
Our enemies are getting stronger and stronger. And we as a country are getting weaker. Our nuclear arsenal doesn't work. We have a disaster called Obamacare. Deductibles are through the roof.
Politicians are all talk, no action. My fellow Republicans want me to support them. And they don't talk jobs and they don't talk China. China is killing us; they're devaluing their currency to a level that makes it impossible for our companies to compete. I watch speeches, and they say wonderful things will happen. And the people are saying, "I just want a job. I don't need the rhetoric; I want a job."
Obamacare kicks in in 2016. It's going to be destructive. Patients are beside themselves; they had a plan that was good, and they have no plan now. We have to repeal Obamacare. It can be replaced with something much better - much better and much less expensive for people and for the government. We can do it.
Politicians will never make America great. They're controlled by lobbyists, donors, and special interests. We have to stop doing things for some people; it's destroying our country. It has to stop now.
Our country needs a truly great leader. We need a leader that can bring back jobs, bring back manufacturing, bring back our military, take care of our vets. And we also need a cheerleader. We need somebody that can take the brand of the United States and make it great again.
I have the kind of mindset that you need to make this country great again. So ladies and gentlemen, I am officially running for president of the United States.

We are going to make our country great again.

Our country has tremendous potential; we have tremendous people. And the greatest social program is a job. I will be "the jobs President." I'll bring back our jobs from China, from Mexico, from Japan. I'll bring back our jobs, and I'll bring back our money. We owe China $1.3 trillion; we owe Japan more than that.
Our president is a bad negotiator. The deal he's making with Iran - he makes that deal, Israel won't exist very long. We have to protect Israel.
I'm a free trader. But the problem with free trade is you need talented people to negotiate for you. If you don't have talented people, if you don't have great leadership, if you don't have people that know business, if you have people that aren't smart - people that are controlled by special interests - it's just not going to work.
China's leaders are much smarter than our leaders. They're building a military island in the middle of the South China sea. They built it in about one year. They're building up their military to a point that it's a problem. And the new China - in terms of trade - is Mexico. So I'm running for president.

$18 trillion in debt; a military that needs equipment; nuclear weapons that are obsolete - what are we doing?
Bush took five days to answer the question - Rubio was unable to answer the question - "Was Iraq a good thing or bad thing?" How are these people going to lead us? They can't. They can't make our country rich again, and therefore make it great again.
We need the right people. This is going to be an election that's based on competence. This is going to be an election that's based on competence because people are tired of being ripped off; they're tired of spending more money on education than any nation in the world per capita, and twenty-five countries are better than us in education.
We're becoming a third-world country because of our infrastructure, our airports, our roads.

I started off in a small office with my father in Brooklyn. I love my father; he was a great negotiator. I learned so much just sitting at his feet. After four years in Brooklyn, I ventured into Manhattan and did a lot of deals: the Grand Hyatt Hotel; the convention center on the West Side. I'm proud of my success. I've employed tens of thousands of people over my lifetime. I have assets of $9,240,000,000. I have a total net worth over $10 billion. I'm not bragging - that's the kind of thinking our country needs. According to the economists, we will soon become Greece - a country that's unsalvageable. We're going to be there soon.
So I would repeal and replace Obamacare, and I would build a wall on our southern border. Nobody would be tougher on ISIS. I will find, within our military, the right guy to take that military and make it really work. I will stop Iran from getting nuclear weapons. I will immediately terminate President Obama's illegal executive order on immigration; protect the Second Amendment; end Common Core; rebuild the country's infrastructure - our bridges, our roadways, our airports; save Medicare, Medicaid and Social Security - get rid of fraud, waste, and abuse, taking back all of the money that's being lost; renegotiate our foreign trade deals; reduce our $18 trillion in debt; strengthen our military; and take care of our vets.

The American dream is dead. But if I get elected president, I will bring it back bigger and better and stronger than ever before.

We will make America great again.

Thank you. Thank you very much.

Wow. Whoa. That is some group of people. Thousands.
So nice, thank you very much. That's really nice. Thank you. It's great to be at Trump Tower. It's great to be in a wonderful city, New York. And it's an honor to have everybody here. This is beyond anybody's expectations. There's been no crowd like this.
And, I can tell, some of the candidates, they went in. They didn't know the air-conditioner didn't work. They sweated like dogs.

They didn't know the room was too big, because they didn't have anybody there. How are they going to beat ISIS? I don't think it's gonna happen.

Our country is in serious trouble. We don't have victories anymore. We used to have victories, but we don't have them. When was the last time anybody saw us beating, let's say, China in a trade deal? They kill us. I beat China all the time. All the time.

We want Trump. We want Trump.
When did we beat Japan at anything? They send their cars over by the millions, and what do we do? When was the last time you saw a Chevrolet in Tokyo? It doesn't exist, folks. They beat us all the time.
When do we beat Mexico at the border? They're laughing at us, at our stupidity. And now they are beating us economically. They are not our friend, believe me. But they're killing us economically.
The U.S. has become a dumping ground for everybody else's problems.

Thank you. It's true, and these are the best and the finest. When Mexico sends its people, they're not sending their best. They're not sending you. They're not sending you. They're sending people that have lots of problems, and they're bringing those problems with us. They're bringing drugs. They're bringing crime. They're rapists. And some, I assume, are good people.
But I speak to border guards and they tell us what we're getting. And it only makes common sense. It only makes common sense. They're sending us not the right people.
It's coming from more than Mexico. It's coming from all over South and Latin America, and it's coming probably - probably - from the Middle East. But we don't know. Because we have no protection and we have no competence, we don't know what's happening. And it's got to stop and it's got to stop fast.
Islamic terrorism is eating up large portions of the Middle East. They've become rich. I'm in competition with them.
They just built a hotel in Syria. Can you believe this? They built a hotel. When I have to build a hotel, I pay interest. They don't have to pay interest, because they took the oil that, when we left Iraq, I said we should've taken.
So now ISIS has the oil, and what they don't have, Iran has. And in 19 - and I will tell you this, and I said it very strongly, years ago, I said - and I love the military, and I want to have the strongest military that we've ever had, and we need it more now than ever. But I said, "Don't hit Iraq," because you're going to totally destabilize the Middle East. Iran is going to take over the Middle East, Iran and somebody else will get the oil, and it turned out that Iran is now taking over Iraq. Think of it. Iran is taking over Iraq, and they're taking it over big league.
We spent $2 trillion in Iraq, $2 trillion. We lost thousands of lives, thousands in Iraq. We have wounded soldiers, who I love, I love - they're great - all over the place, thousands and thousands of wounded soldiers.
And we have nothing. We can't even go there. We have nothing. And every time we give Iraq equipment, the first time a bullet goes off in the air, they leave it.
Last week, I read 2,300 Humvees - these are big vehicles - were left behind for the enemy. 2,000? You would say maybe two, maybe four? 2,300 sophisticated vehicles, they ran, and the enemy took them.
We need Trump now.
You're right.

Last quarter, it was just announced our gross domestic product - a sign of strength, right? But not for us. It was below zero. Whoever heard of this? It's never below zero.
Our labor participation rate was the worst since 1978. But think of it, GDP below zero, horrible labor participation rate.
And our real unemployment is anywhere from 18 to 20 percent. Don't believe the 5.6. Don't believe it.
That's right. A lot of people up there can't get jobs. They can't get jobs, because there are no jobs, because China has our jobs and Mexico has our jobs. They all have jobs.
But the real number, the real number is anywhere from 18 to 19 and maybe even 21 percent, and nobody talks about it, because it's a statistic that's full of nonsense.
Our enemies are getting stronger and stronger by the way, and we as a country are getting weaker. Even our nuclear arsenal doesn't work.
It came out recently they have equipment that is 30 years old. They don't know if it worked. And I thought it was horrible when it was broadcast on television, because boy, does that send signals to Putin and all of the other people that look at us and they say, "That is a group of people, and that is a nation that truly has no clue. They don't know what they're doing. They don't know what they're doing."

We have a disaster called the big lie: Obamacare. Obamacare.
Yesterday, it came out that costs are going for people up 29, 39, 49, and even 55 percent, and deductibles are through the roof. You have to be hit by a tractor, literally, a tractor, to use it, because the deductibles are so high, it's virtually useless. It's virtually useless. It is a disaster. And remember the $5 billion website? $5 billion we spent on a website, and to this day it doesn't work. A $5 billion website.
I have so many websites, I have them all over the place. I hire people, they do a website. It costs me $3. $5 billion website.

Well, you need somebody, because politicians are all talk, no action. Nothing's gonna get done. They will not bring us - believe me - to the promised land. They will not.
As an example, I've been on the circuit making speeches, and I hear my fellow Republicans. And they're wonderful people. I like them. They all want me to support them. They don't know how to bring it about. They come up to my office. I'm meeting with three of them in the next week. And they don't know - "Are you running? Are you not running? Could we have your support? What do we do? How do we do it?"
I like them. And I hear their speeches. And they don't talk jobs and they don't talk China. When was the last time you heard China is killing us? They're devaluing their currency to a level that you wouldn't believe. It makes it impossible for our companies to compete, impossible. They're killing us.
But you don't hear that from anybody else. You don't hear it from anybody else. And I watch the speeches.
Thank you.
I watch the speeches of these people, and they say the sun will rise, the moon will set, all sorts of wonderful things will happen. And people are saying, "What's going on? I just want a job. Just get me a job. I don't need the rhetoric. I want a job."
And that's what's happening. And it's going to get worse, because remember, Obamacare really kicks in in 2016. Obama is going to be out playing golf. He might be on one of my courses. I would invite him, I actually would say. I have the best courses in the world, so I'd say, you what, if he wants to - I have one right next to the White House, right on the Potomac. If he'd like to play, that's fine.

In fact, I'd love him to leave early and play, that would be a very good thing.

But Obamacare kicks in in 2016. Really big league. It is going to be amazingly destructive. Doctors are quitting. I have a friend who's a doctor, and he said to me the other day, "Donald, I never saw anything like it. I have more accountants than I have nurses. It's a disaster. My patients are beside themselves. They had a plan that was good. They have no plan now."
We have to repeal Obamacare, and it can be - and - and it can be replaced with something much better for everybody. Let it be for everybody. But much better and much less expensive for people and for the government. And we can do it.

So I've watched the politicians. I've dealt with them all my life. If you can't make a good deal with a politician, then there's something wrong with you. You're certainly not very good. And that's what we have representing us. They will never make America great again. They don't even have a chance. They're controlled fully - they're controlled fully by the lobbyists, by the donors, and by the special interests, fully.
Yes, they control them. Hey, I have lobbyists. I have to tell you. I have lobbyists that can produce anything for me. They're great. But you know what? It won't happen. It won't happen. Because we have to stop doing things for some people, but for this country, it's destroying our country. We have to stop, and it has to stop now.
Now, our country needs - our country needs a truly great leader, and we need a truly great leader now. We need a leader that wrote "The Art of the Deal."
Yes.
We need a leader that can bring back our jobs, can bring back our manufacturing, can bring back our military, can take care of our vets. Our vets have been abandoned.

And we also need a cheerleader.
You know, when President Obama was elected, I said, "Well, the one thing, I think he'll do well. I think he'll be a great cheerleader for the country. I think he'd be a great spirit."
He was vibrant. He was young. I really thought that he would be a great cheerleader.
But not a leader.
He's not a leader. That's true. You're right about that.
But he wasn't a cheerleader. He's actually a negative force. He's been a negative force. He wasn't a cheerleader; he was the opposite.
We need somebody that can take the brand of the United States and make it great again. It's not great again.

We need - we need somebody - we need somebody that literally will take this country and make it great again. We can do that.

And, I will tell you, I love my life. I have a wonderful family. They're saying, "Dad, you're going to do something that's going to be so tough."
You know, all of my life, I've heard that a truly successful person, a really, really successful person and even modestly successful cannot run for public office. Just can't happen. And yet that's the kind of mindset that you need to make this country great again.
So ladies and gentlemen…

I am officially running for president of the United States, and we are going to make our country great again.

It can happen. Our country has tremendous potential. We have tremendous people.
We have people that aren't working. We have people that have no incentive to work. But they're going to have incentive to work, because the greatest social program is a job. And they'll be proud, and they'll love it, and they'll make much more than they would've ever made, and they'll be - they'll be doing so well, and we're going to be thriving as a country, thriving. It can happen.

I will be the greatest jobs president that God ever created. I tell you that.

I'll bring back our jobs from China, from Mexico, from Japan, from so many places. I'll bring back our jobs, and I'll bring back our money.
Right now, think of this: We owe China $1.3 trillion. We owe Japan more than that. So they come in, they take our jobs, they take our money, and then they loan us back the money, and we pay them in interest, and then the dollar goes up so their deal's even better.
How stupid are our leaders? How stupid are these politicians to allow this to happen? How stupid are they?

I'm going to tell you - thank you. I'm going to tell you a couple of stories about trade, because I'm totally against the trade bill for a number of reasons.
Number one, the people negotiating don't have a clue. Our president doesn't have a clue. He's a bad negotiator.
He's the one that did Bergdahl. We get Bergdahl, they get five killer terrorists that everybody wanted over there.
We get Bergdahl. We get a traitor. We get a no-good traitor, and they get the five people that they wanted for years, and those people are now back on the battlefield trying to kill us. That's the negotiator we have.
Take a look at the deal he's making with Iran. He makes that deal, Israel maybe won't exist very long. It's a disaster, and we have to protect Israel. Yes, we do. Yes, we do.
So we need people - I'm a free trader. But the problem with free trade is you need really talented people to negotiate for you. If you don't have talented people, if you don't have great leadership, if you don't have people that know business, not just a political hack that got the job because he made a contribution to a campaign, which is the way all jobs, just about, are gotten, free trade terrible.
Free trade can be wonderful if you have smart people, but we have people that are stupid. We have people that aren't smart. And we have people that are controlled by special interests. And it's just not going to work.
So, here's a couple of stories happened recently. A friend of mine is a great manufacturer. And, you know, China comes over and they dump all their stuff, and I buy it. I buy it, because, frankly, I have an obligation to buy it, because they devalue their currency so brilliantly, they just did it recently, and nobody thought they could do it again.
But with all our problems with Russia, with all our problems with everything - everything, they got away with it again. And it's impossible for our people here to compete.
So I want to tell you this story. A friend of mine who's a great manufacturer, calls me up a few weeks ago. He's very upset. I said, "What's your problem?"
He said, "You know, I make great product."
And I said, "I know. I know that because I buy the product."
He said, "I can't get it into China. They won't accept it. I sent a boat over and they actually sent it back. They talked about environmental, they talked about all sorts of crap that had nothing to do with it."
I said, "Oh, wait a minute, that's terrible. Does anyone know this?"
He said, "Yeah, they do it all the time with other people."
I said, "They send it back?"
"Yeah. So I finally got it over there and they charged me a big tariff. They're not supposed to be doing that. I told them."
Now, they do charge you tariff on trucks, when we send trucks and other things over there.
Ask Boeing. They wanted Boeing's secrets. They wanted their patents and all their secrets before they agreed to buy planes from Boeing.
Hey, I'm not saying they're stupid. I like China. I sell apartments for - I just sold an apartment for $15 million to somebody from China. Am I supposed to dislike them? I own a big chunk of the Bank of America Building at 1290 Avenue of the Americas, that I got from China in a war. Very valuable.
I love China. The biggest bank in the world is from China. You know where their United States headquarters is located? In this building, in Trump Tower. I love China. People say, "Oh, you don't like China?"
No, I love them. But their leaders are much smarter than our leaders, and we can't sustain ourself with that. There's too much - it's like - it's like take the New England Patriots and Tom Brady and have them play your high school football team. That's the difference between China's leaders and our leaders.
They are ripping us. We are rebuilding China. We're rebuilding many countries. China, you go there now, roads, bridges, schools, you never saw anything like it. They have bridges that make the George Washington Bridge look like small potatoes. And they're all over the place.
We have all the cards, but we don't know how to use them. We don't even know that we have the cards, because our leaders don't understand the game. We could turn off that spigot by charging them tax until they behave properly.
Now they're going militarily. They're building a military island in the middle of the South China sea. A military island. Now, our country could never do that because we'd have to get environmental clearance, and the environmentalist wouldn't let our country - we would never build in an ocean. They built it in about one year, this massive military port.
They're building up their military to a point that is very scary. You have a problem with ISIS. You have a bigger problem with China.
And, in my opinion, the new China, believe it or not, in terms of trade, is Mexico.
So this man tells me about the manufacturing. I say, "That's a terrible story. I hate to hear it."
But I have another one, Ford.
So Mexico takes a company, a car company that was going to build in Tennessee, rips it out. Everybody thought the deal was dead. Reported it in the Wall Street Journal recently. Everybody thought it was a done deal. It's going in and that's going to be it, going into Tennessee. Great state, great people. All of a sudden, at the last moment, this big car manufacturer, foreign, announces they're not going to Tennessee. They're gonna spend their $1 billion in Mexico instead. Not good.
Now, Ford announces a few weeks ago that Ford is going to build a $2.5 billion car and truck and parts manufacturing plant in Mexico. $2.5 billion, it's going to be one of the largest in the world. Ford. Good company.
So I announced that I'm running for president.

One of the early things I would do, probably before I even got in - and I wouldn't even use - you know, I have - I know the smartest negotiators in the world. I know the good ones. I know the bad ones. I know the overrated ones.
You get a lot of them that are overrated. They're not good. They think they are. They get good stories, because the newspapers get buffaloed. But they're not good.
But I know the negotiators in the world, and I put them one for each country. Believe me, folks. We will do very, very well, very, very well.
But I wouldn't even waste my time with this one. I would call up the head of Ford, who I know. If I was president, I'd say, "Congratulations. I understand that you're building a nice $2.5 billion car factory in Mexico and that you're going to take your cars and sell them to the United States zero tax, just flow them across the border."
And you say to yourself, "How does that help us," right? "How does that help us? Where is that good"? It's not.
So I would say, "Congratulations. That's the good news. Let me give you the bad news. Every car and every truck and every part manufactured in this plant that comes across the border, we're going to charge you a 35-percent tax, and that tax is going to be paid simultaneously with the transaction, and that's it.
Now, here's what is going to happen. If it's not me in the position, it's one of these politicians that we're running against, you know, the 400 people that we're running against. And here's what's going to happen. They're not so stupid. They know it's not a good thing, and they may even be upset by it. But then they're going to get a call from the donors or probably from the lobbyist for Ford and say, "You can't do that to Ford, because Ford takes care of me and I take care of you, and you can't do that to Ford."
And guess what? No problem. They're going to build in Mexico. They're going to take away thousands of jobs. It's very bad for us.
So under President Trump, here's what would happen:

The head of Ford will call me back, I would say within an hour after I told them the bad news. But it could be he'd want to be cool, and he'll wait until the next day. You know, they want to be a little cool.
And he'll say, "Please, please, please." He'll beg for a little while, and I'll say, "No interest." Then he'll call all sorts of political people, and I'll say, "Sorry, fellas. No interest," because I don't need anybody's money. It's nice. I don't need anybody's money.
I'm using my own money. I'm not using the lobbyists. I'm not using donors. I don't care. I'm really rich.

And by the way, I'm not even saying that in a - that's the kind of mindset, that's the kind of thinking you need for this country.
Absolutely.
So - because we got to make the country rich.
It sounds crass. Somebody said, "Oh, that's crass." It's not crass.
We got $18 trillion in debt. We got nothing but problems.
We got a military that needs equipment all over the place. We got nuclear weapons that are obsolete.
We've got nothing. We've got Social Security that's going to be destroyed if somebody like me doesn't bring money into the country. All these other people want to cut the hell out of it. I'm not going to cut it at all; I'm going to bring money in, and we're going to save it.

But here's what's going to happen:
After I'm called by 30 friends of mine who contributed to different campaigns, after I'm called by all of the special interests and by the - the donors and by the lobbyists - and they have zero chance at convincing me, zero - I'll get a call the next day from the head of Ford. He'll say. "Please reconsider," I'll say no.
He'll say, "Mr. President, we've decided to move the plant back to the United States, and we're not going to build it in Mexico." That's it. They have no choice. They have no choice.
There are hundreds of things like that. I'll give you another example. Saudi Arabia, they make $1 billion a day. $1 billion a day. I love the Saudis. Many are in this building. They make a billion dollars a day. Whenever they have problems, we send over the ships. We say "we're gonna protect." What are we doing? They've got nothing but money.
If the right person asked them, they'd pay a fortune. They wouldn't be there except for us.
And believe me, you look at the border with Yemen. You remember Obama a year ago, Yemen was a great victory. Two weeks later, the place was blown up. Everybody got out - and they kept our equipment.
They always keep our equipment. We ought to send used equipment, right? They always keep our equipment. We ought to send some real junk, because, frankly, it would be - we ought to send our surplus. We're always losing this gorgeous brand-new stuff.
But look at that border with Saudi Arabia. Do you really think that these people are interested in Yemen? Saudi Arabia without us is gone. They're gone.
And I'm the one that made all of the right predictions about Iraq. You know, all of these politicians that I'm running against now - it's so nice to say I'm running as opposed to if I run, if I run. I'm running.

But all of these politicians that I'm running against now, they're trying to disassociate. I mean, you looked at Bush, it took him five days to answer the question on Iraq. He couldn't answer the question. He didn't know. I said, "Is he intelligent?"
Then I looked at Rubio. He was unable to answer the question, is Iraq a good thing or bad thing? He didn't know. He couldn't answer the question.
How are these people gonna lead us? How are we gonna - how are we gonna go back and make it great again? We can't. They don't have a clue. They can't lead us. They can't. They can't even answer simple questions. It was terrible.
But Saudi Arabia is in big, big trouble. Now, thanks to fracking and other things, the oil is all over the place. And I used to say it, there are ships at sea, and this was during the worst crisis, that were loaded up with oil, and the cartel kept the price up, because, again, they were smarter than our leaders. They were smarter than our leaders.
There is so much wealth out there that can make our country so rich again, and therefore make it great again. Because we need money. We're dying. We're dying. We need money. We have to do it. And we need the right people.
So Ford will come back. They'll all come back. And I will say this, this is going to be an election, in my opinion, that's based on competence.
Yes.
Somebody said - thank you, darlin'.

Somebody said to me the other day, a reporter, a very nice reporter, "But, Mr. Trump, you're not a nice person."
We don't need nice.
That's true. But actually I am. I think I am a nice person. People that know me, like me. Does my family like me? I think so, right. Look at my family. I'm proud of my family.

By the way, speaking of my family, Melania, Barron, Kai, Donnie, Don, Vanessa, Tiffany, Evanka did a great job. Did she do a great job?

Great. Jared, Laura and Eric, I'm very proud of my family. They're a great family.

So the reporter said to me the other day, "But, Mr. Trump, you're not a nice person. How can you get people to vote for you?"
I said, "I don't know." I said, "I think that number one, I am a nice person. I give a lot of money away to charities and other things. I think I'm actually a very nice person."
But, I said, "This is going to be an election that's based on competence, because people are tired of these nice people. And they're tired of being ripped off by everybody in the world. And they're tired of spending more money on education than any nation in the world per capita, than any nation in the world, and we are 26th in the world, 25 countries are better than us in education. And some of them are like third world countries. But we're becoming a third word country, because of our infrastructure, our airports, our roads, everything. So one of the things I did, and I said, you know what I'll do. I'll do it. Because a lot of people said, "He'll never run. Number one, he won't want to give up his lifestyle."
They're right about that, but I'm doing it.
Number two, I'm a private company, so nobody knows what I'm worth. And the one thing is that when you run, you have to announce and certify to all sorts of governmental authorities your net worth.
So I said, "That's OK." I'm proud of my net worth. I've done an amazing job.
I started off - thank you - I started off in a small office with my father in Brooklyn and Queens, and my father said - and I love my father. I learned so much. He was a great negotiator. I learned so much just sitting at his feet playing with blocks listening to him negotiate with subcontractors. But I learned a lot.
But he used to say, "Donald, don't go into Manhattan. That's the big leagues. We don't know anything about that. Don't do it."
I said, "I gotta go into Manhattan. I gotta build those big buildings. I gotta do it, Dad. I've gotta do it."
And after four or five years in Brooklyn, I ventured into Manhattan and did a lot of great deals - the Grand Hyatt Hotel. I was responsible for the convention center on the west side. I did a lot of great deals, and I did them early and young. And now I'm building all over the world, and I love what I'm doing.
But they all said, a lot of the pundits on television, "Well, Donald will never run, and one of the main reasons is he's private and he's probably not as successful as everybody thinks."
So I said to myself, you know, nobody's ever going to know unless I run, because I'm really proud of my success. I really am.

I've employed - I've employed tens of thousands of people over my lifetime. That means medical. That means education. That means everything.
So a large accounting firm and my accountants have been working for months, because it's big and complex, and they've put together a statement, a financial statement, just a summary. But everything will be filed eventually with the government, and we don't extensions or anything. We'll be filing it right on time. We don't need anything.

And it was even reported incorrectly yesterday, because they said, "He had assets of $9 billion." So I said, "No, that's the wrong number. That's the wrong number. Not assets."
So they put together this. And before I say it, I have to say this. I made it the old-fashioned way. It's real estate. You know, it's real estate.
It's labor, and it's unions good and some bad and lots of people that aren't in unions, and it's all over the place and building all over the world.
And I have assets - big accounting firm, one of the most highly respected - 9 billion 240 million dollars.
Yeah.
And I have liabilities of about $500 million . That's long-term debt, very low interest rates.
In fact, one of the big banks came to me and said, "Donald, you don't have enough borrowings. Could we loan you $4 billion"? I said, "I don't need it. I don't want it. And I've been there. I don't want it."
But in two seconds, they give me whatever I wanted. So I have a total net worth, and now with the increase, it'll be well-over $10 billion. But here, a total net worth of - net worth, not assets, not - a net worth, after all debt, after all expenses, the greatest assets - Trump Tower, 1290 Avenue of the Americas, Bank of America building in San Francisco, 40 Wall Street, sometimes referred to as the Trump building right opposite the New York - many other places all over the world.
So the total is $8,737,540,00.
Now I'm not doing that…

I'm not doing that to brag, because you know what? I don't have to brag. I don't have to, believe it or not.
I'm doing that to say that that's the kind of thinking our country needs. We need that thinking. We have the opposite thinking.
We have losers. We have losers. We have people that don't have it. We have people that are morally corrupt. We have people that are selling this country down the drain.
So I put together this statement, and the only reason I'm telling you about it today is because we really do have to get going, because if we have another three or four years - you know, we're at $8 trillion now. We're soon going to be at $20 trillion.According to the economists - who I'm not big believers in, but, nevertheless, this is what they're saying - that $24 trillion - we're very close - that's the point of no return. $24 trillion. We will be there soon. That's when we become Greece. That's when we become a country that's unsalvageable. And we're gonna be there very soon. We're gonna be there very soon.
Make America strong.
So, just to sum up, I would do various things very quickly. I would repeal and replace the big lie, Obamacare.
Yeah.

I would build a great wall, and nobody builds walls better than me, believe me, and I'll build them very inexpensively, I will build a great, great wall on our southern border. And I will have Mexico pay for that wall.
Yes.
Mark my words.

Nobody would be tougher on ISIS than Donald Trump. Nobody.

I will find - within our military, I will find the General Patton or I will find General MacArthur, I will find the right guy. I will find the guy that's going to take that military and make it really work. Nobody, nobody will be pushing us around.
Yes.

I will stop Iran from getting nuclear weapons. And we won't be using a man like Secretary Kerry that has absolutely no concept of negotiation, who's making a horrible and laughable deal, who's just being tapped along as they make weapons right now, and then goes into a bicycle race at 72 years old, and falls and breaks his leg. I won't be doing that. And I promise I will never be in a bicycle race. That I can tell you.

I will immediately terminate President Obama's illegal executive order on immigration, immediately.

Fully support and back up the Second Amendment.

Now, it's very interesting. Today I heard it. Through stupidity, in a very, very hard core prison, interestingly named Clinton, two vicious murderers, two vicious people escaped, and nobody knows where they are. And a woman was on television this morning, and she said, "You know, Mr. Trump," and she was telling other people, and I actually called her, and she said, "You know, Mr. Trump, I always was against guns. I didn't want guns. And now since this happened" - it's up in the prison area - "my husband and I are finally in agreement, because he wanted the guns. We now have a gun on every table. We're ready to start shooting."
I said, "Very interesting."
So protect the Second Amendment.

End - end Common Core. Common Core should - it is a disaster. Bush is totally in favor of Common Core. I don't see how he can possibly get the nomination. He's weak on immigration. He's in favor of Common Core. How the hell can you vote for this guy? You just can't do it. We have to end - education has to be local.
Rebuild the country's infrastructure.
Yeah.
Nobody can do that like me. Believe me. It will be done on time, on budget, way below cost, way below what anyone ever thought.
I look at the roads being built all over the country, and I say I can build those things for one-third. What they do is unbelievable, how bad.
You know, we're building on Pennsylvania Avenue, the Old Post Office, we're converting it into one of the world's great hotels. It's gonna be the best hotel in Washington, D.C. We got it from the General Services Administration in Washington. The Obama administration. We got it. It was the most highly sought after - or one of them, but I think the most highly sought after project in the history of General Services. We got it. People were shocked, Trump got it.
Well, I got it for two reasons. Number one, we're really good. Number two, we had a really good plan. And I'll add in the third, we had a great financial statement. Because the General Services, who are terrific people, by the way, and talented people, they wanted to do a great job. And they wanted to make sure it got built.
So we have to rebuild our infrastructure, our bridges, our roadways, our airports. You come into La Guardia Airport, it's like we're in a third world country. You look at the patches and the 40-year-old floor. They throw down asphalt, and they throw.
You look at these airports, we are like a third world country. And I come in from China and I come in from Qatar and I come in from different places, and they have the most incredible airports in the world. You come to back to this country and you have LAX, disaster. You have all of these disastrous airports. We have to rebuild our infrastructure.
Save Medicare, Medicaid and Social Security without cuts. Have to do it.

Get rid of the fraud. Get rid of the waste and abuse, but save it. People have been paying it for years. And now many of these candidates want to cut it. You save it by making the United States, by making us rich again, by taking back all of the money that's being lost.
Renegotiate our foreign trade deals.
Yes.

Reduce our $18 trillion in debt, because, believe me, we're in a bubble. We have artificially low interest rates. We have a stock market that, frankly, has been good to me, but I still hate to see what's happening. We have a stock market that is so bloated.
Be careful of a bubble because what you've seen in the past might be small potatoes compared to what happens. So be very, very careful.
And strengthen our military and take care of our vets. So, so important.
Yes.

Sadly, the American dream is dead.
Bring it back.
But if I get elected president I will bring it back bigger and better and stronger than ever before, and we will make America great again.
Thank you. Thank you very much.


Thank you so much.  That's so nice.  Isn't he a great guy.  He doesn't get a fair press; he doesn't get it.  It's just not fair.  And I have to tell you I'm here, and very strongly here, because I have great respect for Steve King and have great respect likewise for Citizens United, David and everybody, and tremendous resect for the Tea Party.  Also, also the people of Iowa.  They have something in common.  Hard-working people.  They want to work, they want to make the country great.  I love the people of Iowa.  So that's the way it is.  Very simple.   
With that said, our country is really headed in the wrong direction with a president who is doing an absolutely terrible job.  The world is collapsing around us, and many of the problems we've caused.  Our president is either grossly incompetent, a word that more and more people are using, and I think I was the first to use it, or he has a completely different agenda than you want to know about, which could be possible.  In any event, Washington is broken, and our country is in serious trouble and total disarray.  Very simple.  Politicians are all talk, no action.  They are all talk and no action.  And it's constant; it never ends.   
And I'm a conservative, actually very conservative, and I'm a Republican.  And I'm very disappointed by our Republican politicians.  Because they let the president get away with absolute murder.  You see always, oh we're going to do this, we're going to-.  Nothing ever happens; nothing ever happens.   
You look at Obamacare.  A total catastrophe and by the way it really kicks in in '16 and it is going to be a disaster.  People are closing up shops.  Doctors are quitting the business.  I have a friend of mine who's a doctor, a very good doctor, a very successful guy.  He said, I have more accountants than I have patients.  And he needs because it is so complicated and so terrible and he's never had that before and he's going to close up his business.  And he was very successful guy.  But it's happening more and more. 
Look at Obamacare with a $5 billion website.  I have many websites, many, many websites.  They're all over the place.  But for $10, okay? 
Now everything about Obamacare was a lie.  It was a filthy lie.  And when you think about it, lies, I mean are they prosecuted?  Does anyone do anything?  And what are the Republican politicians doing about it?  He lied about the doctor, he lied about every aspect.  You can keep your plan.  And you've all heard that hundreds of times.  That's like the real estate location, location.  I don't even say it anymore because everybody goes location, location.  But you have heard this about Obamacare.   
And it's disgraceful.  It's a big, fat, horrible lie.  Your deductibles are going through the roof.  You're not going to get-unless you're hit by an army tank, you're not going to get coverage.  And people that had plans that they loved, that they really loved, don't have those plans anymore.  So it's a real, real disaster.  And somebody has to repeal and replace Obamacare.  And they have to do it fast and not just talk about it. 
Now, we have to build a fence.  And it's got to be a beauty.  Who can build better than Trump?  I build; it's what I do.  I build; I build nice fences, but I build great buildings.  Fences are easy, believe me.  I saw the other day on television people just walking across the border.  They're walking.  The military is standing there holding guns and people are just walking right in front, coming into our country.  It is so terrible.  It is so unfair.  It is so incompetent.  And we don't have the best coming in.  We have people that are criminals, we have people that are crooks.  You can certainly have terrorists.  You can certainly have Islamic terrorists.  You can have anything coming across the border.  We don't do anything about it.  So I would say that if I run and if I win, I would certainly start by building a very, very powerful border.
Again, the politicians talk about it and they do nothing about it.  Benghazi.  Oh, Benghazi, Benghazi.  Everything is Benghazi.  What happens?  Nothing.   
IRS, e-mails.  I get sued all the time, okay.  I run a big business.  You know I've always said it's very, very hard for a person who is very successful.  I have done so many deals.  Almost all of them have been tremendously successful.  You'll see that when I file my statements.  I mean you will see; you will be very proud of me, okay.  But I've always said, and I said it strongly, it's very hard for somebody that does tremendous numbers of deals to run for politics, run for political office, any office, let alone president.  Because you've done so much; you've beaten so many people; you've created so many-  Look, Obama, what did he do?  No deal.  He never did a deal.  He did one deal.  A house.  And if you did that house you'd be in jail right now, okay.  He got away with murder.  But I can tell you, e-mails.  IRS, the e-mails, thousands of them, they were lost; they were lost.  If you were in my world you would know that e-mails can't be lost; they can't be lost.  So why aren't our politicians finding out where those e-mails are?   
They talk about executive orders and they talk about immigration and they talk about oh well we have to stop the border; that's the end of it.  Believe me if I did something you would have a border that would be great.  But they talk about it.  And then you have a president that does an executive order.  Nobody even heard of an executive order.  He does it to let people come in and nobody does anything about executive orders.  Why didn't they go to court and ask for declaratory judgment-which is something that when you know somebody is going to go after you and when it's in writing, and he's been saying it for a long time; he said, I'm going to approve this and that-why didn't our Republicans go in and get a declaratory judgment from the courts because you could have started the process six months earlier.  Instead they have a weak lawsuit, that probably the time it's finished, I know so much about this, six, seven, eight years from now everyone's going to forget about it.  We'll be into a different mode, and our country will be further destroyed.  So we have to do something.  
Jobs.  China.  I mean I've made so much money fighting against the Chinese.  One of the best deals I ever did was against the Chinese, and they respect me for it.  And I know them.  And they say, we can't believe what we're getting away with.  We can't believe how stupid your leaders are.  They tell me that.  Now they don't know I'm going to go and make a speech about it, but why not.  But they tell me that.   
And by the way, especially for the folks here that sell so much-goods, I mean the goods you sell are incredible; I don't know if you've been watching what's happening with the devaluations of so many countries.  The Euro, China is going crazy with the devaluation.  I never thought that they'd have the guts to do what they're doing.  They are devaluing down to nothing.  And what it's going to do is make it impossible for you to sell your product; it's going make it impossible for you to compete.  And they're getting away with it.  And they wouldn't have even done it two years ago, but now they feel we're so weak and we have so many different problems all over the world that they can do it.  But you watch this devaluation of all of it.  I mean the Euro, China, Mexico; everybody is devaluing.  And when you hear the dollar is getting stronger, it sounds good.  You know it's one of those things, sounds good.  Be very careful.  Be very careful.  Because we're just going to lose more and more business to these foreign countries that really know what they are doing.  They have it set.  Don't forget another thing.  China became the number one economic power a year ago.  That was unthinkable; to think that that was going to happen.  It was absolutely unthinkable.  So it happened and it's very, very sad.   
Now we spent $2 trillion in Iraq.  We got nothing.  They don't even respect us; they don't even care about us.  Until they started getting their ass kicked, and call, oh please come back and help us.  We want you out; then all of the sudden a new group forms, ISIS.  By the way, you know how they formed.  They took the oil.  And for those of you that know and love Donald Trump-there are some of you-have I been saying for four years, keep the oil.  So now ISIS has the oil.  And the stuff that ISIS doesn't have, Iran is going to take.  So we get nothing.  We have $2 trillion and we have thousands of lives lost, thousands, and we have, what do we have.  I mean I walk down the streets of New York and I see so many wounded warriors, incredible people.  And we have to help those people, we have to help our vets, we have to help our military, we have to build our military.  But, and we have to do it fast; we have to do it fast.  We have incompetent people.  They put people in charge that have no clue what they're doing.  It needs money.   
We have to make our country rich again so we do that, so we can save Social Security.  'Cause I'm not a cutter; I'll probably be the only Republican that does not want to cut Social Security.  I'm not a cutter of Social Security; I want to make the country rich so that Social Security can be afforded, and Medicare and Medicaid.  Get rid of the waste, get rid of the fraud, but you deserve your Social Security; you've been paying your Security.  And like, I like Congressman Ryan, I like a lot of the people that are talking about you know cutting Social Security, and by the way the Democrats are eating your lunch on this issue.  It's an issue that you're not going to win; you've got to make the country rich again and strong again so that you can afford it, and so you can afford military, and all of the other things.   
Now, we have a game changer now, and the game changer is nuclear weapons.  We really do have to get strong, and we have to get strong fast.  We can't let Iran get a nuclear weapon.  We can't do it.  Can't do it.  We cannot let that happen.  You know in the old days, I would have said 100 years ago, 50 years ago, 30 years ago, pull out and let them fight each other.   
Here we are in Syria.  We're fighting people that want to overturn Syria.  Think of this.  We're fighting ISIS, but ISIS wants to overturn the government.  Maybe you let them fight for a little while and then you take out the one that remains, okay.  But think of it; think of it.  ISIS is fighting them and we are bombing the hell out of them, but we want Syria to fall.  There are so many things; there are so many things.   
But the one game changer that we have to be careful with, that we never really had to think about  too much before, other than a cetain number of years ago, is the nuclear.  Nuclear today, it's not like soldiers in uniforms shooting rifles.  You can take out the East Coast of this country, you can take out large sections of the Midwest, you can take out things that were unthinkable.  The power.  And we have to be in a position where that never, ever, ever, every happens.  We've never had this before.   
We have a situation in Afghanistan; we're spending tremendous amounts of money there.  We're trying to do the right thing.  We have leadership, again-no leadership respects us.  You know, leadership of other places never respect stupid people, okay, that's one thing you're going to find.  The same thing is happening there.  And I never knew that Afghanistan until a year ago or so, Afghanistan has tremendous wealth in minerals, different, not the oil, but minerals.  And we're fighting here, and on the other side of the mountain China is taking out all the minerals.  They're taking it out.  Trillion of dollars and millions of dollars of minerals.  So we're fighting here and they are taking it out, looking at us and saying thank you very much sucker.  It's really, really crazy.
So we have to rebuild quickly our infrastructure of this country.  If we don't-  The other day in Ohio a bridge collapsed.  Bridges are collapsing all over the country.  The reports on bridges and the like are unbelievable, what's happening with our infrastructure. 
I go to Saudi Arabia, I go to Dubai; I am doing big jobs in Dubai.  I go to various different places.  I go to China.  They are building a bridge on every corner.  They have bridges that make the George Washington Bridge like small time stuff.  They're building the most incredible things you have ever seen.  They are building airports in Qatar-which they like to say "cutter" but I've always said "qatar" so I'll keep it "qatar" what the hell.  But they're building, they're building an airport and have just completed an airport the likes of which you have never seen, in Dubai an airport the likes of which you have never seen.  And then I come back to LaGuardia where the runways have potholes.  The place is falling apart.  You go into the main terminal and they have a terraza floor that's so old it's falling apart.  And they have a hole in it, and they replace it with asphalt.  So you have a white terraza floor and they put asphalt all over the place.  This is inside, not outside.  And I just left Dubai where they have the most incredible thing you've ever seen.  In fact my pilot said oh Mr. Trump this is such an honor.  I said it's not an honor; they're just smart.  But you look at LAX, and you look at Kennedy Airport, and you look at our airports generally, you look at our roadways where they're crumbling.   
You look at all of the things that are bad-  I'll give you an example. And this isn't part of what I was going to say, but I ride down the highways and somebody makes those guard rails.  You know the guard rails.  The ones that sort of go like this [demonstrates with hand] that are always  bent, rusted and horrible.  Did you ever see more than like 20 feet which isn't corroded, or bent or the heat, if it gets too hot, it just crushes.  Now they've been selling this thing for 25 years.  Why doesn't someone stop them and get something that works.  Because they don't know; they don't know what's happening.  Somebody made a lot of money on that.  They don't know what is happening.  
So we have to make our country great again.  We have to rebuild our country.  And we have a long way to go.  We are just in such serious trouble because we owe so much money.  Now we owe it to the Chinese, a lot of it.  We owe it to other countries.  They're the ones that hold the debt.  And then we give them money.  We have countries that we owe money to and yet we're giving them subsidies.  I just ordered thousands of television sets and between LG and Samsung and I mean you know-  No American company comes to see and comes to bid.  It's South Korea, and whenever they have a problem we send the battleships, we send the destroyers, we send our airplanes, we're going to protect them.  What are we doing; why aren't they paying us?  Why aren't they paying us; what are we doing?  I order thousands and thousands of sets all the time, for some reason it's South Korea.  You know whether it's China, South Korea, but in this case televisions, South Korea.  Why aren't they doing something to justify what is going on?   
Now, we have a very important election coming up.  We have a presidential election coming up. And we have some good people.  Nobody like Trump of course, but these are minor details.  We have some good people. 
It' can't be Mitt because Mitt ran and failed.  He failed.  I mean I liked him.  Look-like him, dislike him-the 47% statement that he made, that's not going away.  The Romneycare from Massachusetts, that's not going away.  What do you think they're going to say oh we won't bring that up this time.  It's not fair because it was a long t-  That doesn't work.  But more importantly, he choked.  Something happened to him in the last month.  He had that election won.  And let me tell you something.  That election, sort of like a dealmaker that can't close the deal.  I know many of those guys; they get it up to the one-yard line, they go ah, ah I can't close it.  Or a golfer that can't sink the three-footer to win the tournament.  And there are many of them.  Most people are like that; I mean most people are like that.  You can't give somebody another chance, 'cause actually I think this election is tougher to win than beating a failed president.  I really do.  I think beating Obama would have been a much easier one than the one that's coming up, which is sad to say but true.  So you can't have Romney.  He choked. 
You can't have Bush.  The last thing we need is another Bush.  Now I made that statement very strongly, and now every one says the last thing-  You know they copied it.  I'll be accused of copying the statement; that's the bad thing.  But I said it.  I was the one that said it first, and I mean it.  The last thing we need is another Bush.  Now, he's totally in favor of Common Core; that's a disaster, that's bad, it should be local and all of that.  But he's totally in favor of Common Core.  He's very, very weak on immigration.  Don't forget-remember his statement-they come for love.  I say, what?  Come for love?  You've got these people coming, half of them are criminals.  They're coming for love?  They're coming for a lot of other reasons, and it's not love.  And when he runs, you got to remember his brother really gave us Obama.  I was never a big fan, but his brother gave us Obama.  'Cause Abraham Lincoln coming home back from the dead could not have won the election because it was going so badly and the economy was just absolutely in shambles that last couple of months.  And then he appointed Justice Roberts.  And Jeb wanted Justice Roberts.  And Justice Roberts basically approved Obamacare in a shocking decision that nobody believes.  So you can't have Jeb Bush.  And he's going to lose aside from that; he's not going to win.  So Mitt and-you just can't have those two.  That's it.  That's it.  It's so simple. 
So just in summing up and I just wrote a few of these little points down because it's very important.  And I watch these teleprompters, and by the way I think any president candidate that runs should not be allowed to use a teleprompter, because we got one that uses teleprompters.  And people say, oh he is so quick on his feet.  He is reading it.  I mean give me a break.  Everything is read.  You don't really test the mettle of a man or a woman unless they can get up on stage and talk.  And that's what we ended up getting-the king of teleprompters.  But, so when I look at these things here I say you know what, it's so much easier, it would be so nice, just bah, pa, bah, pa, bah, bing, bing, bing.  No problems, get off stage, everybody falls asleep and that's the end of that.  But we have to do something about these teleprompters.   
But in looking at these situations-  I built an incredible company.  And you'll see that.  An incredible company; a wonderful company.  I employ thousands of people and I love doing what I'm doing.  And in a certain way, I wish I weren't doing this, but our country is in such trouble and would be so easy to fix.  We have such great potential. 
So if I run for president and if I win, I would totally succeed in:  
creating jobs;  
defeating ISIS and stopping the Islamic terrorists-and you have to do that; 
reducing the budget deficit-so important, have to do it; 
securing our Southern border-and I mean seriously securing it; 
stopping nuclear weapons in Iran and elsewhere;  
saving Social Security, Medicare and Medicaid, without cutting it down to the bone because it's not fair to people that have been paying for their whole lives and other people and it's not fair to future people coming up, and we can do it; 
repealing Obamacare and replacing it with something far better for the people, and far less expensive, both for the people and for the country.  And believe me there are plans that are so much better for everybody.  And everybody can be covered.  I'm not saying leave 50-percent of the people out.  Everybody can be c- This plan is just a basic disaster.  Nobody knows.  As bad as the website was, this is how bad the plan itself is; 
fixing our country's infrastructure, our bridges, our schools, our highways, our airports.  And that, I can tell you, nobody is close to Trump.  I just got the best hotel in North America.  I'm building, which is sort of interesting, think of this one.  I'm building one of the great hotels of the world on Pennsylvania Avenue, right opposite the White House, between the White House and Congress.  Right on Penn.-  The  Old Post Office site, and I got it from Obama.  Do you believe that?  And everybody wanted it.  So, I can't believe it myself.  But it's going to be fantastic;   
and so many other things.  
I know what needs to be done to make America great again.  We can make this country great again.  The potential is enormous.  And I am serious thinking of running for president because I can do the job.   
Thank you all very much.  Thank you.  Thank you.  Thank you.  Thank you.  Thank you very much, everybody.  Thank you.  Beautiful.  Thank you.



Thank you for the opportunity to speak to you, and thank you to the Center for the National Interest for honoring me with this invitation.

I would like to talk today about how to develop a new foreign policy direction for our country – one that replaces randomness with purpose, ideology with strategy, and chaos with peace.

It is time to shake the rust off of America's foreign policy. It's time to invite new voices and new visions into the fold.

The direction I will outline today will also return us to a timeless principle. My foreign policy will always put the interests of the American people, and American security, above all else. That will be the foundation of every decision that I will make.

America First will be the major and overriding theme of my administration.


But to chart our path forward, we must first briefly look back.

We have a lot to be proud of. In the 1940s we saved the world. The Greatest Generation beat back the Nazis and the Japanese Imperialists.

Then we saved the world again, this time from totalitarian Communism. The Cold War lasted for decades, but we won.

Democrats and Republicans working together got Mr. Gorbachev to heed the words of President Reagan when he said: "tear down this wall."

History will not forget what we did.


Unfortunately, after the Cold War, our foreign policy veered badly off course. We failed to develop a new vision for a new time. In fact, as time went on, our foreign policy began to make less and less sense.


Logic was replaced with foolishness and arrogance, and this led to one foreign policy disaster after another.

We went from mistakes in Iraq to Egypt to Libya, to President Obama's line in the sand in Syria. Each of these actions have helped to throw the region into chaos, and gave ISIS the space it needs to grow and prosper.

It all began with the dangerous idea that we could make Western democracies out of countries that had no experience or interest in becoming a Western Democracy.

We tore up what institutions they had and then were surprised at what we unleashed. Civil war, religious fanaticism; thousands of American lives, and many trillions of dollars, were lost as a result. The vacuum was created that ISIS would fill. Iran, too, would rush in and fill the void, much to their unjust enrichment.

Our foreign policy is a complete and total disaster.

No vision, no purpose, no direction, no strategy.

Today, I want to identify five main weaknesses in our foreign policy.

First, Our Resources Are Overextended

President Obama has weakened our military by weakening our economy. He's crippled us with wasteful spending, massive debt, low growth, a huge trade deficit and open borders.

Our manufacturing trade deficit with the world is now approaching $1 trillion a year. We're rebuilding other countries while weakening our own.

Ending the theft of American jobs will give us the resources we need to rebuild our military and regain our financial independence and strength.

I am the only person running for the Presidency who understands this problem and knows how to fix it.

Secondly, our allies are not paying their fair share.

Our allies must contribute toward the financial, political and human costs of our tremendous security burden. But many of them are simply not doing so. They look at the United States as weak and forgiving and feel no obligation to honor their agreements with us.

In NATO, for instance, only 4 of 28 other member countries, besides America, are spending the minimum required 2% of GDP on defense.

We have spent trillions of dollars over time – on planes, missiles, ships, equipment – building up our military to provide a strong defense for Europe and Asia. The countries we are defending must pay for the cost of this defense – and, if not, the U.S. must be prepared to let these countries defend themselves.

The whole world will be safer if our allies do their part to support our common defense and security.

A Trump Administration will lead a free world that is properly armed and funded.


Thirdly, our friends are beginning to think they can't depend on us.

We've had a president who dislikes our friends and bows to our enemies.

He negotiated a disastrous deal with Iran, and then we watched them ignore its terms, even before the ink was dry.

Iran cannot be allowed to have a nuclear weapon and, under a Trump Administration, will never be allowed to have a nuclear weapon.

All of this without even mentioning the humiliation of the United States with Iran's treatment of our ten captured sailors.

In negotiation, you must be willing to walk. The Iran deal, like so many of our worst agreements, is the result of not being willing to leave the table. When the other side knows you're not going to walk, it becomes absolutely impossible to win.

At the same time, your friends need to know that you will stick by the agreements that you have with them.


President Obama gutted our missile defense program, then abandoned our missile defense plans with Poland and the Czech Republic.

He supported the ouster of a friendly regime in Egypt that had a longstanding peace treaty with Israel – and then helped bring the Muslim Brotherhood to power in its place.

Israel, our great friend and the one true Democracy in the Middle East, has been snubbed and criticized by an Administration that lacks moral clarity. Just a few days ago, Vice President Biden again criticized Israel – a force for justice and peace – for acting as an impediment to peace in the region.

President Obama has not been a friend to Israel. He has treated Iran with tender love and care and made it a great power in the Middle East – all at the expense of Israel, our other allies in the region and, critically, the United States.

We've picked fights with our oldest friends, and now they're starting to look elsewhere for help.

Fourth, our rivals no longer respect us.

In fact, they are just as confused as our allies, but an even bigger problem is that they don't take us seriously any more.

When President Obama landed in Cuba on Air Force One, no leader was there to meet or greet him – perhaps an incident without precedent in the long and prestigious history of Air Force One.

Then, amazingly, the same thing happened in Saudi Arabia - it's called no respect.

Do you remember when the President made a long and expensive trip to Copenhagen, Denmark to get the Olympics for our country, and, after this unprecedented effort, it was announced that the United States came in fourth place?

He should have known the result before making such an embarrassing commitment.

The list of humiliations goes on and on.

President Obama watches helplessly as North Korea increases its aggression and expands even further with its nuclear reach.

Our president has allowed China to continue its economic assault on American jobs and wealth, refusing to enforce trade rules – or apply the leverage on China necessary to rein in North Korea.

He has even allowed China to steal government secrets with cyber attacks and engage in industrial espionage against the United States and its companies.

We've let our rivals and challengers think they can get away with anything.

If President Obama's goal had been to weaken America, he could not have done a better job.

Finally, America no longer has a clear understanding of our foreign policy goals.

Since the end of the Cold War and the break-up of the Soviet Union, we've lacked a coherent foreign policy.

One day we're bombing Libya and getting rid of a dictator to foster democracy for civilians, the next day we are watching the same civilians suffer while that country falls apart.

We're a humanitarian nation. But the legacy of the Obama-Clinton interventions will be weakness, confusion, and disarray.

We have made the Middle East more unstable and chaotic than ever before.

We left Christians subject to intense persecution and even genocide.

Our actions in Iraq, Libya and Syria have helped unleash ISIS.

And we're in a war against radical Islam, but President Obama won't even name the enemy!

Hillary Clinton also refuses to say the words "radical Islam," even as she pushes for a massive increase in refugees.

After Secretary Clinton's failed intervention in Libya, Islamic terrorists in Benghazi took down our consulate and killed our ambassador and three brave Americans. Then, instead of taking charge that night, Hillary Clinton decided to go home and sleep! Incredible.

Clinton blames it all on a video, an excuse that was a total lie. Our Ambassador was murdered and our Secretary of State misled the nation – and by the way, she was not awake to take that call at 3 o'clock in the morning.

And now ISIS is making millions of dollars a week selling Libyan oil.

This will change when I am president.

To all our friends and allies, I say America is going to be strong again. America is going to be a reliable friend and ally again.

We're going to finally have a coherent foreign policy based upon American interests, and the shared interests of our allies.

We are getting out of the nation-building business, and instead focusing on creating stability in the world.

Our moments of greatest strength came when politics ended at the water's edge.

We need a new, rational American foreign policy, informed by the best minds and supported by both parties, as well as by our close allies.

This is how we won the Cold War, and it's how we will win our new and future struggles.

First, we need a long-term plan to halt the spread and reach of radical Islam.

Containing the spread of radical Islam must be a major foreign policy goal of the United States.


Events may require the use of military force. But it's also a philosophical struggle, like our long struggle in the Cold War.

In this we're going to be working very closely with our allies in the Muslim world, all of which are at risk from radical Islamic violence.

We should work together with any nation in the region that is threatened by the rise of radical Islam. But this has to be a two-way street – they must also be good to us and remember us and all we are doing for them.

The struggle against radical Islam also takes place in our homeland. There are scores of recent migrants inside our borders charged with terrorism. For every case known to the public, there are dozens more.

We must stop importing extremism through senseless immigration policies.

A pause for reassessment will help us to prevent the next San Bernardino or worse - all you have to do is look at the World Trade Center and September 11th.

And then there's ISIS. I have a simple message for them. Their days are numbered. I won't tell them where and I won't tell them how. We must as, a nation, be more unpredictable. But they're going to be gone. And soon.

Secondly, we have to rebuild our military and our economy.

The Russians and Chinese have rapidly expanded their military capability, but look what's happened to us!

Our nuclear weapons arsenal – our ultimate deterrent – has been allowed to atrophy and is desperately in need of modernization and renewal.

Our active duty armed forces have shrunk from 2 million in 1991 to about 1.3 million today.

The Navy has shrunk from over 500 ships to 272 ships during that time.


The Air Force is about 1/3 smaller than 1991. Pilots are flying B-52s in combat missions today which are older than most people in this room.

And what are we doing about this? President Obama has proposed a 2017 defense budget that, in real dollars, cuts nearly 25% from what we were spending in 2011.

Our military is depleted, and we're asking our generals and military leaders to worry about global warming.

We will spend what we need to rebuild our military. It is the cheapest investment we can make. We will develop, build and purchase the best equipment known to mankind. Our military dominance must be unquestioned.

But we will look for savings and spend our money wisely. In this time of mounting debt, not one dollar can be wasted.



We are also going to have to change our trade, immigration and economic policies to make our economy strong again – and to put Americans first again. This will ensure that our own workers, right here in America, get the jobs and higher pay that will grow our tax revenue and increase our economic might as a nation.

We need to think smarter about areas where our technological superiority gives us an edge. This includes 3-D printing, artificial intelligence and cyberwarfare.

A great country also takes care of its warriors. Our commitment to them is absolute. A Trump Administration will give our service men and women the best equipment and support in the world when they serve, and the best care in the world when they return as veterans to civilian life.

Finally, we must develop a foreign policy based on American interests.


Businesses do not succeed when they lose sight of their core interests and neither do countries.

Look at what happened in the 1990s. Our embassies in Kenya and Tanzania were attacked and seventeen brave sailors were killed on the USS Cole. And what did we do? It seemed we put more effort into adding China to the World Trade Organization – which has been a disaster for the United States – than into stopping Al Qaeda.

We even had an opportunity to take out Osama Bin Laden, and didn't do it. And then, we got hit at the World Trade Center and the Pentagon, the worst attack on our country in its history.

Our foreign policy goals must be based on America's core national security interests, and the following will be my priorities.

In the Middle East, our goals must be to defeat terrorists and promote regional stability, not radical change. We need to be clear-sighted about the groups that will never be anything other than enemies.
And we must only be generous to those that prove they are our friends.

We desire to live peacefully and in friendship with Russia and China. We have serious differences with these two nations, and must regard them with open eyes. But we are not bound to be adversaries. We should seek common ground based on shared interests. Russia, for instance, has also seen the horror of Islamic terrorism.

I believe an easing of tensions and improved relations with Russia – from a position of strength – is possible. Common sense says this cycle of hostility must end. Some say the Russians won't be reasonable. I intend to find out. If we can't make a good deal for America, then we will quickly walk from the table.

Fixing our relations with China is another important step towards a prosperous century. China respects strength, and by letting them take advantage of us economically, we have lost all of their respect. We have a massive trade deficit with China, a deficit we must find a way, quickly, to balance.
A strong and smart America is an America that will find a better friend in China. We can both benefit or we can both go our separate ways.

After I am elected President, I will also call for a summit with our NATO allies, and a separate summit with our Asian allies. In these summits, we will not only discuss a rebalancing of financial commitments, but take a fresh look at how we can adopt new strategies for tackling our common challenges.

For instance, we will discuss how we can upgrade NATO's outdated mission and structure – grown out of the Cold War – to confront our shared challenges, including migration and Islamic terrorism.

I will not hesitate to deploy military force when there is no alternative. But if America fights, it must fight to win. I will never send our finest into battle unless necessary – and will only do so if we have a plan for victory.

Our goal is peace and prosperity, not war and destruction.

The best way to achieve those goals is through a disciplined, deliberate and consistent foreign policy.

With President Obama and Secretary Clinton we've had the exact opposite: a reckless, rudderless and aimless foreign policy – one that has blazed a path of destruction in its wake.

After losing thousands of lives and spending trillions of dollars, we are in far worse shape now in the Middle East than ever before.

I challenge anyone to explain the strategic foreign policy vision of Obama-Clinton – it has been a complete and total disaster.

I will also be prepared to deploy America's economic resources. Financial leverage and sanctions can be very persuasive – but we need to use them selectively and with determination. Our power will be used if others do not play by the rules.

Our friends and enemies must know that if I draw a line in the sand, I will enforce it.

However, unlike other candidates for the presidency, war and aggression will not be my first instinct. You cannot have a foreign policy without diplomacy. A superpower understands that caution and restraint are signs of strength.

Although not in government service, I was totally against the War in Iraq, saying for many years that it would destabilize the Middle East. Sadly, I was correct, and the biggest beneficiary was Iran, who is systematically taking over Iraq and gaining access to their rich oil reserves – something it has wanted to do for decades. And now, to top it all off, we have ISIS.

My goal is to establish a foreign policy that will endure for several generations.

That is why I will also look for talented experts with new approaches, and practical ideas, rather than surrounding myself with those who have perfect resumes but very little to brag about except responsibility for a long history of failed policies and continued losses at war.

Finally, I will work with our allies to reinvigorate Western values and institutions. Instead of trying to spread "universal values" that not everyone shares, we should understand that strengthening and promoting Western civilization and its accomplishments will do more to inspire positive reforms around the world than military interventions.

These are my goals, as president.

I will seek a foreign policy that all Americans, whatever their party, can support, and which our friends and allies will respect and welcome.

The world must know that we do not go abroad in search of enemies, that we are always happy when old enemies become friends, and when old friends become allies.

To achieve these goals, Americans must have confidence in their country and its leadership again.


Many Americans must wonder why our politicians seem more interested in defending the borders of foreign countries than their own.

Americans must know that we are putting the American people first again. On trade, on immigration, on foreign policy – the jobs, incomes and security of the American worker will always be my first priority.

No country has ever prospered that failed to put its own interests first. Both our friends and enemies put their countries above ours and we, while being fair to them, must do the same.

We will no longer surrender this country, or its people, to the false song of globalism.

The nation-state remains the true foundation for happiness and harmony. I am skeptical of international unions that tie us up and bring America down, and will never enter America into any agreement that reduces our ability to control our own affairs.

NAFTA, as an example, has been a total disaster for the U.S. and has emptied our states of our manufacturing and our jobs. Never again. Only the reverse will happen. We will keep our jobs and bring in new ones. Their will be consequences for companies that leave the U.S. only to exploit it later.

Under a Trump Administration, no American citizen will ever again feel that their needs come second to the citizens of foreign countries.

I will view the world through the clear lens of American interests.

I will be America's greatest defender and most loyal champion. We will not apologize for becoming successful again, but will instead embrace the unique heritage that makes us who we are.

The world is most peaceful, and most prosperous, when America is strongest.

America will continually play the role of peacemaker.

We will always help to save lives and, indeed, humanity itself. But to play that role, we must make America strong again.

We must make America respected again. And we must make America great again.

If we do that, perhaps this century can be the most peaceful and prosperous the world has ever known. Thank you.
Good evening. Thank you very much.
I speak to you today as a lifelong supporter and true friend of Israel. 
I am a newcomer to politics, but not to backing the Jewish state.

In 2001, weeks after the attacks on New York City and on Washington and, frankly, the attacks on all of us, attacks that perpetrated and they were perpetrated by the Islamic fundamentalists, Mayor Rudy Giuliani visited Israel to show solidarity with terror victims.
I sent my plane because I backed the mission for Israel 100 percent.

In spring of 2004 at the height of the violence in the Gaza Strip, I was the grand marshal of the 40th Salute to Israel Parade, the largest-single gathering in support of the Jewish state.

It was a very dangerous time for Israel and frankly for anyone supporting Israel. Many people turned down this honor. I did not. I took the risk and I'm glad I did.

But I didn't come here tonight to pander to you about Israel. That's what politicians do: all talk, no action. Believe me.

I came here to speak to you about where I stand on the future of American relations with our strategic ally, our unbreakable friendship and our cultural brother, the only democracy in the Middle East, the state of Israel.

Thank you.
My number-one priority is to dismantle the disastrous deal with Iran.

Thank you. Thank you.
I have been in business a long time. I know deal-making. And let me tell you, this deal is catastrophic for America, for Israel and for the whole of the Middle East.
 The problem here is fundamental. We've rewarded the world's leading state sponsor of terror with $150 billion, and we received absolutely nothing in return.

 I've studied this issue in great detail, I would say actually greater by far than anybody else.

 Believe me. Oh, believe me. And it's a bad deal.
 The biggest concern with the deal is not necessarily that Iran is going to violate it because already, you know, as you know, it has, the bigger problem is that they can keep the terms and still get the bomb by simply running out the clock. And of course, they'll keep the billions and billions of dollars that we so stupidly and foolishly gave them.

 The deal doesn't even require Iran to dismantle its military nuclear capability. Yes, it places limits on its military nuclear program for only a certain number of years, but when those restrictions expire, Iran will have an industrial-sized, military nuclear capability ready to go and with zero provision for delay, no matter how bad Iran's behavior is. Terrible, terrible situation that we are all placed in and especially Israel.

 When I'm president, I will adopt a strategy that focuses on three things when it comes to Iran. First, we will stand up to Iran's aggressive push to destabilize and dominate the region.

 Iran is a very big problem and will continue to be. But if I'm not elected president, I know how to deal with trouble. And believe me, that's why I'm going to be elected president, folks.

 And we are leading in every poll. Remember that, please.

 Iran is a problem in Iraq, a problem in Syria, a problem in Lebanon, a problem in Yemen and will be a very, very major problem for Saudi Arabia. Literally every day, Iran provides more and better weapons to support their puppet states. Hezbollah, Lebanon received - and I'll tell you what, it has received sophisticated anti-ship weapons, anti-aircraft weapons and GPS systems and rockets like very few people anywhere in the world and certainly very few countries have. Now they're in Syria trying to establish another front against Israel from the Syrian side of the Golan Heights.
 In Gaza, Iran is supporting Hamas and Islamic jihad.
 And in the West Bank, they're openly offering Palestinians $7,000 per terror attack and $30,000 for every Palestinian terrorist's home that's been destroyed. A deplorable, deplorable situation.

 Iran is financing military forces throughout the Middle East and it's absolutely incredible that we handed them over $150 billion to do even more toward the many horrible acts of terror.

 Secondly, we will totally dismantle Iran's global terror network which is big and powerful, but not powerful like us.

 Iran has seeded terror groups all over the world. During the last five years, Iran has perpetuated terror attacks in 25 different countries on five continents. They've got terror cells everywhere, including in the Western Hemisphere, very close to home.
 Iran is the biggest sponsor of terrorism around the world. And we will work to dismantle that reach, believe me, believe me.

 Third, at the very least, we must enforce the terms of the previous deal to hold Iran totally accountable. And we will enforce it like you've never seen a contract enforced before, folks, believe me.

 Iran has already, since the deal is in place, test-fired ballistic missiles three times. Those ballistic missiles, with a range of 1,250 miles, were designed to intimidate not only Israel, which is only 600 miles away, but also intended to frighten Europe and someday maybe hit even the United States. And we're not going to let that happen. We're not letting it happen. And we're not letting it happen to Israel, believe me.

 Thank you. Thank you.
 Do you want to hear something really shocking? As many of the great people in this room know, painted on those missiles in both Hebrew and Farsi were the words "Israel must be wiped off the face of the earth." You can forget that.

 What kind of demented minds write that in Hebrew?
 And here's another. You talk about twisted. Here's another twisted part. Testing these missiles does not even violate the horrible deal that we've made. The deal is silent on test missiles. But those tests do violate the United Nations Security Council resolutions.
 The problem is no one has done anything about it. We will, we will. I promise, we will.

 Thank you.
 Which brings me to my next point, the utter weakness and incompetence of the United Nations.

 The United Nations is not a friend of democracy, it's not a friend to freedom, it's not a friend even to the United States of America where, as you know, it has its home. And it surely is not a friend to Israel.

 With President Obama in his final year - yea!



 He may be the worst thing to ever happen to Israel, believe me, believe me. And you know it and you know it better than anybody.
 So with the president in his final year, discussions have been swirling about an attempt to bring a Security Council resolution on terms of an eventual agreement between Israel and Palestine.
 Let me be clear: An agreement imposed by the United Nations would be a total and complete disaster.

 The United States must oppose this resolution and use the power of our veto, which I will use as president 100 percent.

 When people ask why, it's because that's not how you make a deal. Deals are made when parties come together, they come to a table and they negotiate. Each side must give up something. It's values. I mean, we have to do something where there's value in exchange for something that it requires. That's what a deal is. A deal is really something that when we impose it on Israel and Palestine, we bring together a group of people that come up with something.
 That's not going to happen with the United Nations. It will only further, very importantly, it will only further delegitimize Israel. It will be a catastrophe and a disaster for Israel. It's not going to happen, folks.

 And further, it would reward Palestinian terrorism because every day they're stabbing Israelis and even Americans. Just last week, American Taylor Allen Force, a West Point grad, phenomenal young person who served in Iraq and Afghanistan, was murdered in the street by a knife-wielding Palestinian. You don't reward behavior like that. You cannot do it.

 There's only one way you treat that kind of behavior. You have to confront it.

 So it's not up to the United Nations to really go with a solution. It's really the parties that must negotiate a resolution themselves. They have no choice. They have to do it themselves or it will never hold up anyway. The United States can be useful as a facilitator of negotiations, but no one should be telling Israel that it must be and really that it must abide by some agreement made by others thousands of miles away that don't even really know what's happening to Israel, to anything in the area. It's so preposterous, we're not going to let that happen.

 When I'm president, believe me, I will veto any attempt by the U.N. to impose its will on the Jewish state. It will be vetoed 100 percent.

 You see, I know about deal-making. That's what I do. I wrote "The Art of the Deal."

 One of the best-selling, all-time - and I mean, seriously, I'm saying one of because I'll be criticized when I say "the" so I'm going to be very diplomatic - one of…

 I'll be criticized. I think it is number one, but why take a chance? 

 One of the all-time best-selling books about deals and deal- making. To make a great deal, you need two willing participants. We know Israel is willing to deal. Israel has been trying.

 That's right. Israel has been trying to sit down at the negotiating table without preconditions for years. You had Camp David in 2000 where Prime Minister Barak made an incredible offer, maybe even too generous; Arafat rejected it.
 In 2008, Prime Minister Olmert made an equally generous offer. The Palestinian Authority rejected it also.
 Then John Kerry tried to come up with a framework and Abbas didn't even respond, not even to the secretary of state of the United States of America. They didn't even respond.
 When I become president, the days of treating Israel like a second-class citizen will end on day one.

 Thank you.
 And when I say something, I mean it, I mean it.
 I will meet with Prime Minister Netanyahu immediately. I have known him for many years and we'll be able to work closely together to help bring stability and peace to Israel and to the entire region.
 Meanwhile, every single day you have rampant incitement and children being taught to hate Israel and to hate the Jews. It has to stop.

 When you live in a society where the firefighters are the heroes, little kids want to be firefighters. When you live in a society where athletes and movie stars are the heroes, little kids want to be athletes and movie stars.
 In Palestinian society, the heroes are those who murder Jews. We can't let this continue. We can't let this happen any longer.

 You cannot achieve peace if terrorists are treated as martyrs. Glorifying terrorists is a tremendous barrier to peace. It is a horrible, horrible way to think. It's a barrier that can't be broken. That will end and it'll end soon, believe me.

 In Palestinian textbooks and mosques, you've got a culture of hatred that has been fomenting there for years. And if we want to achieve peace, they've got to go out and they've got to start this educational process. They have to end education of hatred. They have to end it and now.

 There is no moral equivalency. Israel does not name public squares after terrorists. Israel does not pay its children to stab random Palestinians.
 You see, what President Obama gets wrong about deal-making is that he constantly applies pressure to our friends and rewards our enemies.

 And you see that happening all the time, that pattern practiced by the president and his administration, including former Secretary of State Hillary Clinton, who is a total disaster, by the way.


 She and President Obama have treated Israel very, very badly.

 But it's repeated itself over and over again and has done nothing (to) embolden those who hate America. We saw that with releasing the $150 billion to Iran in the hope that they would magically join the world community. It didn't happen.

 President Obama thinks that applying pressure to Israel will force the issue. But it's precisely the opposite that happens. Already half of the population of Palestine has been taken over by the Palestinian ISIS and Hamas, and the other half refuses to confront the first half, so it's a very difficult situation that's never going to get solved unless you have great leadership right here in the United States.
 We'll get it solved. One way or the other, we will get it solved.

 But when the United States stands with Israel, the chances of peace really rise and rises exponentially. That's what will happen when Donald Trump is president of the United States.
 We will move the American embassy to the eternal capital of the Jewish people, Jerusalem.

 And we will send a clear signal that there is no daylight between America and our most reliable ally, the state of Israel.

 The Palestinians must come to the table knowing that the bond between the United States and Israel is absolutely, totally unbreakable.

 They must come to the table willing and able to stop the terror being committed on a daily basis against Israel. They must do that.
 And they must come to the table willing to accept that Israel is a Jewish state and it will forever exist as a Jewish state.

 I love the people in this room. I love Israel. I love Israel. I've been with Israel so long in terms of I've received some of my greatest honors from Israel, my father before me, incredible. My daughter, Ivanka, is about to have a beautiful Jewish baby.

 In fact, it could be happening right now, which would be very nice as far as I'm concerned.

 So I want to thank you very much. This has been a truly great honor. Thank you, everybody. Thank you.
 Thank you very much.


 This was going to be a speech on Hillary Clinton and all of the bad things and we all know what's going on, and especially how poor she'd do as president in these very, very troubled times of radical Islamic terrorism.
 Even her former Secret Service agent, who's seen her under pressure and in times of stress, has stated that she lacks the temperament and integrity to be our president. There will be plenty of opportunity to discuss these important issues at a later time, and I will deliver that speech very, very soon.
 But today, there's only one thing to discuss, the growing threat of terrorism inside of our borders. The attack on the Pulse nightclub in Orlando, Florida, was the worst terror strike on our soil since September 11th, and the worst mass shooting in our country's history.
 So many people - it's just hard to believe, but just so many people dead, so many people gravely injured, so much carnage, such a disgrace. The horror is beyond description. The families of these wonderful people are totally devastated, and they will be forever. Likewise, our whole nation and indeed the whole world is devastated.
 We express our deepest sympathies to the victims, the wounded, and their families. We mourn as one people for our nation's loss, and pledge our support to any and all who need it. I would like to ask now that we all observe a moment of silence for the victims of this attack.
 Thank you. Our nation stands together in solidarity with the members of Orlando's LGBT community. They have been through something that nobody could ever experience. This is a very dark moment in America's history. A radical Islamic terrorist targeted the nightclub, not only because he wanted to kill Americans, but in order to execute gay and lesbian citizens, because of their sexual orientation.
 It's a strike at the heart and soul of who we are as a nation. It's an assault on the ability of free people to live their lives, love who they want, and express their identity. It's an attack on the right of every single American to live in peace and safety in their own country.
 We need to respond to this attack on America as one united people, with force, purpose, and determination. But the current politically correct response cripples our ability to talk and to think and act clearly. We're not acting clearly, we're not talking clearly, we've got problems.
 If we don't get tough, and if we don't get smart, and fast, we're not going to have our country anymore. There will be nothing, absolutely nothing, left. The killer, whose name I will not use, or ever say, was born in Afghan, of Afghan parents, who immigrated to the United States.
 His father published support for the Afghan Taliban, a regime which murders those who don't share its radical views, and they murdered plenty. The father even said he was running for president of Afghanistan. The bottom line is that the only reason the killer was in America in the first place, was because we allowed his family to come here.
 That is a fact, and it's a fact we need to talk about. We have a dysfunctional immigration system, which does not permit us to know who we let into our country, and it does not permit us to protect our citizens properly. We have an incompetent administration.
 And if I'm elected president, that will not change, I will tell you, that will not change over the next four years. We have an administration that will not change. But if I get in there, it's going to change, and it's going to change quickly. We're going from totally incompetent to just the opposite, believe me.

 Thank you.
 With 50 people dead and perhaps more ultimately and dozens more wounded, we cannot afford to talk around issues anymore. We have to address these issues head-on. I called for a ban after San Bernardino and was met with great scorn and anger but now many years and I have to say many years but many are saying that I was right to do so. And although the pause is temporary we must find out what is going on. We have to do it.
 It will be lifted - this ban - when and as a nation we're in a position to properly and perfectly screen these people coming into our country. They're pouring in and we don't know what we're doing. The immigration laws of the United States give the president powers to suspend entry into the country of any class of persons. Now, any class - it really is determined and to be determined by the president for the interests of the United States. And it's as he or she deems appropriate. Hopefully it's he in this case.

 Thank you. I will use this power to protect the American people. When I'm elected I will suspend immigration from areas of the world where there's a proven history of terrorism against the United States, Europe or our allies until we fully understand how to end these threats. After a full …

 Thank you.
 And by the way we have no choice. After a full and partial and long - really long overdue security assessment we will develop a responsible immigration policy that serves the interests and values of America.

 We cannot continue to allow thousands upon thousands of people to pour into our country many of whom have the same thought process as this savage killer. Many of the principles of radical Islam are incompatible with Western values and institutions.
 Remember this, radical Islam is anti-woman, anti-gay and anti- American.

I refuse to allow America to become a place where gay people, Christian people, Jewish people are targets of persecution and intimation by radical Islamic preachers of hate and violence.

This is not just a national security issue. It's a quality of life issue. If we want to protect the quality of life for all Americans - women and children, gay and straight, Jews and Christians and all people then we need to tell the truth about radical Islam and we need to do it now.

We need to tell the truth also about how radical Islam is coming to our shores. And it's coming …

With these people, folks, it's coming. We're importing radical Islamic terrorism into the West through a failed immigration system and through an intelligence community held back by our president. Even our own FBI director has admitted that we cannot effectively check the backgrounds of people we're letting into America. All of the September 11th hijackists were issued visas. Large numbers of Somali refugees in Minnesota have tried to join ISIS.
The Boston bombers came here through political asylum. The male shooter in San Bernardino again whose name I will not mention was the child of immigrants from Pakistan and he brought his wife, the other terrorist from Saudi Arabia through another one of our easily exploited visa programs.

Immigration from Afghanistan into the United States has increased nearly five fold - five fold in just one year. According to Pew Research, 99 percent of the people in Afghanistan support oppressive sharia law. We admit many more, and that's just the way it is. We admit many more from other countries in the region.
And I'll tell you what: They share these oppressive views and values. We want to remain a free and open society. Then, and if we do, then we have to control our borders. We have to control, and we have to control them now, not later. Right now.

Thank you.
Yet Hillary Clinton, for months, and despite so many attacks, repeatedly refused to even say the words radical Islam until I challenged her yesterday. And, guess what, she will probably say them. She sort of has said them, but let's see what happens. She really has no choice, but she doesn't want to.
However, she's really been forced, and she has been forced to say these words. She supports, and the reason is, she supports so much of what is wrong, and what is wrong with this country, and what's going wrong with our country and our borders. She has no clue, in my opinion, what radical Islam is and she won't speak honestly about it if she does, in fact, know. She's in total denial, and her continuing reluctance to ever name the enemy broadcasts weakness across the entire world - true weakness.
I don't know if you know this, but just a few weeks before San Bernardino, the slaughter, that's all it was was a slaughter, Hillary Clinton explained her refusal to say the words "radical Islam." Here is what she said, exact quote, "Muslims are peaceful and tolerant people, and have nothing whatsoever to do with terrorism." That is Hillary Clinton.
So, she says the solution is to ban guns. They tried that in France which has among the toughest gun laws anywhere in the world, and 130 people were brutally murdered by Islamic terrorists in cold blood. Her plan is to disarm law abiding Americans, abolishing the Second Amendment, and leaving only the bad guys and terrorists with guns. No good. Not going to happen, folks. Not going to happen. Not going to happen. 
Thank you.
She wants to take away American's guns and then admit the very people who want to slaughter us. Let them come into the country, we don't have guns. Let them come in, let them have all the fun they want.
I will be meeting with the NRA, which has given me their earliest endorsement in a presidential race, to discuss how to ensure Americans have the means to protect themselves in this age of terror. I will be always defending the Second Amendment.

Thank you. Thank you.
The bottom line is that Hillary supports policies that bring the threat of radical Islam into American and allow it to grow oversees, and it is growing. In fact, Hillary Clinton's catastrophic immigration plan will bring vastly more radical Islamic immigration into this country, threatening not only our society but our entire way of life. When it comes to radical Islamic terrorism, ignorance is not bliss. It's deadly - totally deadly.
The Obama administration, with the support of Hillary Clinton and others, has also damaged our security by restraining our intelligence gathering and we have, just, no intelligence gathering information. We need this information so badly, and he stopped it. We don't have the support. We don't have the support of the law enforcement system because Obama is not letting them do their job. They are not being allowed to do their job. And, they can do it well - better than anybody.
We need a new leader. We need a new leader fast.

Thank you.
They have put political correctness above common sense, above your safety, and above all else. I refuse to be politically correct.

I want to do the right thing. I want to straighten things out and I want to make America great again.

The days of deadly ignorance will end, and they will end soon if I'm elected. As president I will give our intelligence community, law enforcement and military the tools they need to prevent terrorist attacks. They don't have those tools now.

We need an intelligence gathering system second to none. Second to none. That includes better cooperation between state, local and federal officials, and with our allies, very importantly. I will have an Attorney General, a Director of National Intelligence and a Secretary of Defense who'll know how to fight a war on radical Islamic terrorism.

And they will have the support that they need to get the job done right, not like it is right now. It's not right.

We also must ensure the American people are provided the information they need to understand the threat. The Senate subcommittee on Immigration has already identified hundreds of immigrants charged with terrorist activities inside the United States since September 11th. Nearly a year ago, the Senate Subcommittee asked President Obama's Department of Justice, State and Homeland Security to provide the immigration history of all terrorists inside the United States. These Departments refused to comply. Nobody even knows why. They refused to comply.
President Obama must release the full and complete immigration histories of all individuals implicated in terrorist activities of any kind since September 11th. So important. The public has a right to know how these people got here, how they came on to this great land, why are they here?

We have to screen applicants to know whether they are affiliated with or supporting radical groups and beliefs, very simple. We have to control the amount of future immigration into this country and we have to prevent large pockets of radicalization from forming inside America. Not complicated.

Every – and just think of this. Take a look. Every single event, even a single individual can be devastating, and all you have to do is take a look at what happened in Orlando and what happened in other cases. Just a single event. And just one person. Can you imagine what they'll do in large groups, which we're allowing now to come here.
Truly our President doesn't know what he's doing. He's failed us and he's failed us badly. Under his leadership this situation will not get any better, it will only get worse. And I've been saying that for a long time. Each year the United States permanently admits 100,000 immigrants from the Middle East and many more from Muslim countries outside of the Middle East. Our government has been admitting ever- growing numbers, year after year, without any effective plan for our own security.
In fact, Clinton's State Department was in charge of admissions and the admissions process for people applying to enter from overseas. Having learned nothing from these attacks, she now plans to massively increase admissions without a screening plan including a 500 percent increase in Syrian refugees coming into our country. Tell me, tell me – how stupid is that?
This could be a better, bigger, more horrible version than the legendary Trojan Horse ever was. Altogether, under the Clinton plan, you'd be admitting hundreds of thousands of refugees from the Middle East with no system to vet them, or to prevent the radicalization of the children and their children. Not only their children, by the way, they're trying to take over our children and convince them how wonderful ISIS is and how wonderful Islam is and we don't know what's happening.
The burden is on Hillary Clinton to tell us why she believes immigration from these dangerous countries should be increased without any effective system to really to screen. We're not screening people.
So why don't we have an effective screening system? We don't. We're being laughed at all over the world. The burden is on Hillary Clinton to tell us why we should admit anyone into our country who supports violence of any kind against gay and lesbian Americans. The burden is on Hillary Clinton to tell us how she will pay for it, her plan will cost hundreds of billions of dollars long term.
Wouldn't this be money better spent rebuilding America for our current population including the many poor people already living here. We have cities, we have inner cities…

We have poverty all over and this is how we're spending billions of dollars. We have to stop the tremendous flow of Syrian refugees into the United States. We don't know who they are, they have no documentation and we don't know what they're planning and we won't unless we have proper supervisor and proper leadership in which case they're out of here. What I want…

What I want is common sense. I want a mainstream immigration policy that promotes American values. That's a choice I put before the American people. A mainstream immigration policy designed to benefit America or Hillary Clinton's radical immigration policy designed to benefit politically correct special interests. That's all it is. We've got to get smart and tough and vigilant and we've got to do it now because later is too late - going to be too late for our country.
The media talks about home grown terrorism but Islamic radicalism and that's a very, very important term - a term that the president refuses to use and the networks that nurture it are imports from overseas whether you like it or whether you don't like it. Yes, there are many radicalized people already inside our country as a result of poor policies of the past.
But the whole point is that we will be much, much and it will be easier to deal with our current problem if we don't keep on bringing people who add to the problem. And that's what they're doing. We're letting all of these people - hundreds of thousands of people come in and all they're doing is adding to this incredible problem we have.
For instance, the controversial mosque attended by the Boston bombers had at its founder and as its founder an immigrant from overseas charged in an assassination plot. This shooter and amazingly in Orlando was the child of an immigrant father who supported one of the most repressive regimes on earth. Why would we admit people who support violent hatred?
Hillary Clinton can never claim to be a friend of the gay community as long as she continues to support immigration policies that bring Islamic extremists to our country and who suppress women, gays and anyone who doesn't share their views or values.

She can't have it both ways. She can't claim to be supportive of these communities while trying to increase the number of people coming in who want to oppress these same communities. How does this kind of immigration make our lives better? How does this kind of immigration make our country better? Why does Hillary Clinton want to bring people in in vast numbers who reject our values? Why? Explain.
Ask yourself who is really the friend of women and the LGBT community, Donald Trump with actions or Hillary Clinton with her words?
I will tell you who the better friend is and some day I believe that will be proven out bigly .

And by the way the LGBT community is just - what's happened to them is just so sad and to be thinking about where their policies are currently with this administration is a disgrace to that community, I will tell you right now.
Clinton wants to allow radical Islamic terrorists to pour into our country. They enslave women, and they murder gays. I don't want them in our country.

Immigration is a privilege, and we should not let anyone into this country who doesn't support our communities. All of our communities, every single one of them. Americans already admitted four times more immigrants than any country on Earth, anybody in the world. Four times more. At least, because we don't even know who's coming in. And we continue to admit millions more with no real checks or scrutiny.
Not surprisingly, wages for our workers haven't budged. In almost 20 years. You wonder why we get the crowds, you wonder why we get this tremendous support, you wonder why I've gotten more votes than any Republican in any primary in the history of the Republican Party? Take a look at that. Take a look at your security, take a look at the wages. For 18 years they've been stagnant, they've even gone down.
So whether it's a matter of national security, or financial security, we can't afford to keep on going like this. Cannot afford it. We owe $19 trillion in debt. And no longer have any options. Our communities from all backgrounds are ready for some relief. This is not an act of offense against anyone. It's really an act of defense. I want us all, all of us, to work together. We have to form a partnership, with our Muslim communities. We have Muslim communities in this country that are great, and we have to form that partnership.
Now, the Muslim community, so important. They have to work with us. They have to cooperate with law enforcement and turn in the people who they know are bad. They know it. And they have to do it, and they have to do it forthwith. I want to fix our schools. I want to fix our bridges. And our jobs market, we're going to have it rocket again, we're going to make great trade deals. But I want every American to succeed including Muslims.
But the Muslims have to work with us. They have to work with us. They know what's going on. They know that he was bad. They knew the people in San Bernardino were bad. But you know what? They didn't turn them in. And you know what? We had death, and destruction.
Hillary Clinton wants to empty out the Treasury to bring people into the country that include individuals who preach hate against our citizens. I want to protect our citizens, all of our citizens. The terrorist attack on Pulse nightclub demands a full and complete investigation into every single aspect of the assault. In San Bernardino, as an example, people who knew what was going on, they knew exactly, but they used the excuse of racial profiling for not reporting it. They said oh, "We thought so but we didn't want to use racial profiling." Which was probably an excuse given to them by their lawyer, so they don't get in trouble.
We need to know what the killer discussed with his relatives, parents, friends and associates. We need to know if he was affiliated with any radical mosques or radical activists and what, if any, is their immigration status. We have to know, and we have to know fast. We need to know if he traveled anywhere and who he traveled with. We need to know, and we need to make sure, every single last person involved in this plan, including anyone who knew something but didn't tell us, is brought to justice, so when people know what's going on and they don't tell us, and we have an attack, and people die, these people have to have consequences. Big consequences.

America must do more - much more - to protect its citizens, especially people who are potential victims of crimes based on their backgrounds or sexual orientation, as you just saw in Orlando.
It also means we must change our foreign policy. The decision to overthrow the regime in Libya, then pushing for the overthrow of the regime in Syria, among other things, without plans for the day after, have created space for ISIS to expand and grow like nobody has ever seen before.
These actions, along with our disastrous Iran deal, have also reduced our ability to work in partnership with our Muslim allies in the region. That is why our new goal must be to defeat Islamic terrorism not nation building. No more nation building. It's never going to work.
And by the way we've spent almost $5 trillion over the years on trying to nation build in the Middle East and it has been complete and total disaster. We're further away now than we were 15 years ago. For instance, the last major NATO mission was Hillary Clinton's war in Libya. That mission helped to unleash ISIS on a new continent.
I've said NATO need to change its focus and stop terrorism. We have to focus on terrorism and we have to stop terrorism. Since I've raised that criticism and it's OK. I've gotten no credit for it but these are minor details - NATO has since announced a new initiative - front page of the Wall Street Journal four days ago focused on just that. America must unite the whole civilized world in the fight against Islamic terrorism.

Pretty much like we did with communism during the Cold War. We tried it President Obama's way, doesn't work. He gave the world his apology tour. We got ISIS and many other problems in return. That's what we got. Remember the famous apology tour. We're sorry for everything.
I'd like to conclude my remarks today by again expressing our solitarily with the people of Orlando who have come under this horrific attack. When I'm president I pledge to protect and defend all Americans who live inside our borders. Wherever they come from, wherever they were born, I don't care. All Americans living here and following our laws not other laws will be protected.

Thank you. Thank you. We're going to be tough and we're going to be smart and we're going to do it right. America will be a tolerant and open society. America will also be a safe society. We will protect our borders at home. We will defeat ISIS overseas. We have no choice. We will ensure every parent can raise their children in peace and safety. We will make America rich again. We will make America safe again. We will make America great again. Thank you. Thank you very much. Thank you very much.

Thank you. Thank you very much, everybody. Appreciate it. Thank you.


We're only getting started and it's going to be beautiful. Remember that.
Tonight we close one chapter in history and we begin another. Our campaign received more primary votes than any GOP campaign in history. No matter who it is, no matter who they are, we received more votes. This is a great feeling. That's a great feeling.
This is not a testament to me, but a testament to all of the people who believed real change - not Obama change - but real change, is possible. You've given me the honor to lead the Republican party to victory this fall. We're going to do it. We're going to do it, folks. We're going to do it.
I understand the responsibility of carrying the mantle and I will never, ever let you down. Too much work, too many people, blood, sweat, and tears. Never going to let you down. I will make you proud of your party and our movement. That's what it is, a movement.
Recent polls have shown that I'm beating Hillary Clinton and with all of her many problems and the tremendous mistakes that she's made - and she has made tremendous mistakes - we expect our lead to continue to grow and grow substantially.
For everyone who voted for me throughout this campaign, I want to thank you. I want to thank you very, very much. To those who voted for someone else, in either party, I'll work hard to earn your support. And I will work very hard to earn that support. To all of those Bernie Sanders voters who have been left out in the cold by a rigged system of superdelegates, we welcome you with open arms.
And by the way, the terrible trade deals that Bernie was so vehemently against - and he's right on that - will be taken care of far better than anyone ever thought possible. And that's what I do. We are going to have fantastic trade deals. We're going to start making money and bringing in jobs.
Now, I know some people say I'm too much of a fighter. My preference is always peace, however. And I've shown that. I've shown that for a long time. I've built an extraordinary business on relationships and deals that benefit all parties involved. Always. My goal is always, again, to bring people together. But if I'm forced to fight for something I really care about, I will never, ever back down. And our country will never, ever back down.
I've fought for my family, I've fought for more business, I've fought for my employees. And now, I'm going to fight for you, the American people. Like nobody has ever fought before. And I'm not a politician fighting, I'm me. You're going to see some real good things happen. Just remember this, I'm going to be your champion.
I'm going to be America's champion. Because you see, this election isn't about Republican or Democrat, it's about who runs this country. The special interests or the people, and I mean, American people. Every election year, politicians promise change. Obama promised change and it didn't work out too well. And every year, they fail to deliver.
Why would politicians want to change a system that's totally rigged in order to keep them in power? That's what they're doing, folks. Why would politicians want to change a system that's made them and their friends very, very wealthy? I beat a rigged system, by winning with overwhelming support. The only way you could have done it. Landslides all over the country, with every demographic on track to win 37 primary caucus victories in a field that began with 17 very talented people.
After years of disappointment, there's one thing we all have learned. We can't fix the rigged system by relying on - and I mean this so, so strongly - the very people who rigged it. And they rigged it. And do not ever think anything differently. We can't solve our problems by counting on the politicians who created our problems.
The Clintons have turned the politics of personal enrichment into an art form for themselves. They've made hundreds of millions of dollars selling access, selling favors, selling government contracts, and I mean hundreds of millions of dollars.
Secretary Clinton even did all of the work on a totally illegal private server. Something that how she's getting away with nobody understands. Designed to keep her corrupt dealings out of the public record, putting the security of the entire country at risk, and a president in a corrupt system is totally protecting her. Not right.
I am going to give a major speech on probably Monday of next week and we're going to be discussing all of the things that have taken place with the Clintons. I think you're going to find it very informative and very, very interesting. I wonder if the press will want to attend. Who knows.
Hillary Clinton turned the State Department into her private hedge fund. The Russians, the Saudis, the Chinese, all gave money to bill and Hillary and got favorable treatment in return. It's a sad day in America when foreign governments with deep pockets have more influence in our own country than our great citizens.
I didn't need to do this. It's not easy, believe me. I didn't need to do it, but I felt I had to give back to our wonderful country, which has been so good to me and to my family.
I've traveled to many of our states and seen the suffering in people's eyes. I've visited communities in new York, New Jersey, Pennsylvania, Connecticut, Indiana, and Ohio, whose manufacturing jobs, literally, these jobs have virtually disappeared. An embarrassment to our country and it's horrible.
I've embraced the victims of illegal immigration, moms and dads who have had to bury their own children, because of people who shouldn't have been in the country. Remember it, folks. Remember it. I've visited the crumbling cities and the struggling schools. I've seen our dilapidated airports, highways, bridges, and I've compared them to other countries where we see facilities so far superior to ours. It's really not to be believed.
Hard to imagine what's happened to our country. America is being taken apart piece by piece, auctioned off and just rapidly, auctioned off to the highest bidder. We're broke. We're broke. We are $19 trillion, going quickly to $21 trillion. Our infrastructure is a disaster. Our schools are failing. Crime is rising. People are scared. The last thing we need is Hillary Clinton in the White House or an extension of the Obama disaster.
We love our country. We love our country. But we can turn this all around. We're going to do it by putting America first. That commitment is the foundation for change that's been missing and has been missing for a long time. It's important to understand what "America first" means.
It means on foreign policy, we will never enter into any conflict unless it makes us safer as a nation. It has to make us safer as a nation. This is the opposite of Hillary's foreign policy, which invaded Libya, destabilized Iraq, unleashed ISIS, and threw Syria into chaos, and created the mass migration, which is wreaking havoc all over the world. And while putting Iran on the path to nuclear weapons and making them a dominant power in the Middle East. And they are dominant and we have made them that way, folks. We have made them that way.
Better hope I'm president.
On trade, America first means the American worker will have his or her job protected from unfair foreign competition. What's happening there is absolutely a disgrace.
[ Audience member shouts "No TPP!"]
No PPP, you're right about that. We are going, and remember this, we are only going to have great trade deals. We are only going to have this. We're not going to improve, as someone just said, the Transpacific Partnership, which is a disaster, a disaster for our country. Almost as bad as NAFTA, signed by Bill Clinton, which has just stripped our country of our factories and our manufacturing and moved them to other places, in particular, Mexico. If it's not a great deal for our country, we will not sign it.
It's got to be great for our country, for our community, for everybody in here, because believe me, we are all suffering. And we're suffering big league. And it's getting worse.
On energy policy, American first means opening up America's great potential to bring wealth and prosperity to our own workers. Including our wonderful and hard-working miners who have been absolutely, totally mistreated by this administration.
On economic politics, America first means having tax and regulatory policies that keep jobs and wealth in the United States: substantially lower taxes for middle class Americans and businesses, likewise regulation, which is strangling our economy, which would be brought down from its present insane level.
We will make it very, very good for our companies, for our small businesses, and for people that want to survive and do well in our country. On immigration policy, America first means protecting the jobs, wages and security of American workers. Whether first or tenth generation, no matter who you are, we're going to protect your job. Because let me tell you, our jobs are being stripped from our country like we're babies.
The beauty of America first is that it brings us all together. Every American worker of every background is entitled to the same benefits, protections, and rights and privileges. It's got to be that way.
Now, the people in charge say things can't change. I'm here today to tell you that we have to change. We have no choice. We have to change. We're going to put - thank you. We're going to put America back to work. We're going to make our own products. We're going to put America back to work.
We're going to rebuild our inner cities, which are absolutely a shame and so sad. We're going to take care of our African-American people that have been mistreated for so long. We're going to make you and your family safe, secure, and prosperous. Prosperous again. Together, we will put the American people first again.
We will make our communities wealthy. We will make our cities safe again. We will make our country strong again. Ladies and gentlemen, we will make America great again.
Remember.
Thank you.


Thank you very much, everybody. Well, I want to begin by thanking the people of South Carolina. This is a special state. Thank you. These are special people and we got a little boost last week from a place we all remember - New Hampshire. We can't forget it. Special, special. We love it. And they sent us in here with a very good feeling, right?

Very good feeling. So I really want to thank you and my volunteers. All of these people - volunteers and they travel and they - and I say, "what are you doing?" And now they're going to Texas and they're going all over. Some are going to Nevada. I'll be going to Nevada. We're making a big speech tomorrow in Atlanta and then we're going right to Nevada.
And I think we're going to do terrific and the SEC's going to be very, very exciting. We expect to do very, very well. Very well ...

I want to just say thank you to my family. It's been not easy for them. They don't see me anymore. I'm making speeches all the time and I have a great. I really have a great family so I just want to thank all of you.
And Ivanka - you know we have a hospital ready just in case. In South Carolina we're going to have a baby. There's nothing wrong with that, right? So ...

Could be - it could be any second. It could even be before I'm finished but it's - but she insisted on being here. It was so important to Ivanka to insist on being here so thank you. Really good and Jared, Vanessa, Don.
We have a wonderful lieutenant governor who backed us very early in the process.

You know Henry, right? The lieutenant governor of South Carolina. I will take him over the governor anytime because we won. We won ...

He handle that very nicely. He's tough. He's very tough. Tiffany, Eric, Lara and Melania. Melania, say something. Go ahead, please ...

M. TRUMP: Just want to say an amazing place - South Carolina. Congratulation to my husband. He was working very hard and he loves you. We love you and we're going ahead to Nevada. And we will see what happen (sic). He would be the best president ...

And representing some very, very wonderful children, Ivanka. Just say a few words.

I. TRUMP: Thank you, South Carolina. This is an amazing, amazing night. The momentum since the beginning of this campaign has been unbelievable and that's because my father's message resonants so deeply with so many people. So as our family we're incredibly proud. We're incredibly grateful to each of you so thank you for being here to support us. And I will say this, my father is an incredibly hard worker and he'll be working for each and every one of you. So together we'll make America great again. Thank you ...

Thank you very much. Thank you very much. So I was watching upstairs and it was really amazing to be watching what I was watching. And some of the pundits and overall fair but not too much. But a number of the pundits said, "well, if a couple of the other candidates dropped out if you add their scores together it's going to equal Trump."
But these geniuses - they're geniuses - they don't understand that as people drop out I'm going to get a lot of those votes also. You don't just ...

You don't just add them together. So I think we're going to do very, very well. I think we're going to do very well. I want to also congratulate the other candidates. In particular I have to say Ted and Marco did a really good job and they got - they did quite well as I understand. No, come on. Just one minute. Come on. One second, right? Good.
OK. We go back to war tomorrow morning. Tomorrow morning we'll be back but I just want to congratulate the other candidates. There's nothing easy about running for president, I can tell you. It's tough, it's nasty, it's mean, it's vicious, it's beautiful.

When you win it's beautiful and we're going to start - we are going to start winning for our country. We're going to start winning.

Because our country doesn't win anymore. Doesn't win. We don't win with the military, we can't beat ISIS. We have great military but we can't beat ISIS. We don't win on trade. You look at what China's doing to us, what Japan does to us, what Mexico is just killing us at the border - at the border and with trade. Mexico is killing us - absolutely. We'll do the wall. Don't worry. We're going to do the wall.
We're going to do the wall and by the way, who's going to pay for the wall?

Mexico's going to pay for the wall and it's very easy. The other politicians come down, "you can't get Mexico to pay for the wall." I said, "100 percent." We have a $58 billion trade deficit with Mexico. The wall is going to cost $10 to $12 billion, OK? Believe me, they will pay. One of the officials - actually, one of the ex-officials from Mexico had a news conference.
And he announced that we will not be paying for the wall. Who does Mr. Trump think he is? They came to me - the press. These people - look at all those cameras back there.

The press came to me and they told me that he said that he would not pay for the wall. Do you have a comment? I said, "yes. The wall just got 10 feet taller."

It's true. And I love Mexico. I love Mexico, I love China, I love many of these countries that rip us off because we have leaders that are incomptent and don't know what they're doing. I love these countries. They're great. I have thousands and thousands of Hispanics. We're going to Nevada.
I lead - I lead with the Hispanics. I'm leading in every poll with the Hispanics. They love me, I love them. The problem is - the problem is that the leaders of these countries whether it's Mexico or Japan or Viet Nam which is just doing a big number now all of a sudden or China in particular - that's the big one. The greatest abuse of a country that I think I've ever seen financially - China.
What they've done to us is the greatest single theft in the history of the world. They've taken our jobs, they've taken our money, they've taken everything. We're bringing our jobs back, folks. We're bringing our jobs back. We're going to bring them back ...

And I know how to do it. We've had so many - we've had so many incredible endorsements and to me getting the greatest business people to endorse me is very important. Carl Icahn endorsed me, so many others have endorsed me.
And we're going to put these great business people in charge of trade and when China wants to come and negotiate, they're going to negotiate not with a political hack which is what they have now. They're going to negotiate with the best business minds in the world and we have them in this country.
So we're going to do a lot of beautiful work. We're going to terminate Obamacare. It's going to terminated. It's going to be over ...

It's going to be repealed and it's going to be replaced. And you're going to have much better health care at a much smaller cost because Obamacare - if you look - look at the increases in your Obamacare. Twenty-five, 35, 45, even 55 percent. It's dead. It's not working. We're going to go to a plan that's going to be so much better and so much less expensive.

So second amendment by the way - this is a room loves the second amendment. Thank you, fellows. This is a room loves and cherishes the second amendment. We are going to protect our second amendment. Totally ...

Common core is gone. We are getting rid of common core. We're brining education to a local level. The people in this community - every time I see them they want education locally. The parents, the teachers. They want to do it - they don't want bureaucrats in Washington telling them how to educate their children.

We spend as a nation more for education per pupil than any other nation in the world. Not even close. More per pupil - second place doesn't even exist it's so different. And yet out of 30 countries we're ranked number 30. You have China, you have Norway, Swenden, Denmark and then you have number 30, the United States. So we spend the most and we're at the bottom of the heap. It's not going to happen anymore, folks. It's not going to happen anymore.

We are going to build our military which I thank because a number of the people came down and a number of the pundits in Washington I - we love our military.

We love our military. And by the way we love our police. Our police are terrific. We love our police ...

They are not being treated properly. We're going to build our military so big, so good, so strong, so powerful that nobody is ever going to mess with us, folks.
And we're going to buy - we're going to buy the equipment that our generals, our soldiers, that everybody that's in the know want. We're not buying equipment that sells because they have political pull. Because they take campaign and they give campaign contributions.
We are going to get the equipment that they want, not the equipment that they're told to have by senators and congressmen in Washington. We're going to have great equipment.

And the reason I can say that is I'm self-funding my campaign. I'm not getting millions of dollars from all of these ...

I'm not getting millions of dollars from all of these special interests and lobbyists and donors that once they get it they literally do whatever the politicians want. That's not going to happen. And we're going to take care of our vets. We love our vets and they're being treated terribly. We're taking care of our vets.

So we're now off to Nevada and it's a great state. We have great people. We have great people in our nation. No matter where we go - I went to Mobile, Alabama - 35,000 people. We went to Oklahoma recently twice - 20,000 people, 20,000 people. No matter where we go we fill up the arenas.
Over here the other day we had a 9,000 - we had a 10,000 - we have people. The only thing that stops the crowds are the walls because we can't get them in. We have to send thousands of people away.
Time Magazine - Time Magazine last year did an incredible cover story. They said "it's a movement." And that's what it is. It's an incredible movement with incredible people. Incredible people.

It's an incredible movement with incredible people. I tell you. And whether we go - honestly whether we go to Dallas or whether we go anywhere you say - you go to L.A. - you go anywhere you say. Our people are incredible. And our theme - what's our theme? You know it, right?

Our theme which I love may be the greatest theme of all time, right? And the word again eventually is going to come off. We're going to get rid of the whole theme because what's going to happen - make America great again, right?
And the last two weeks because I've gotten to see so many - I guess millions when you add them all up with all of these rooms and all of these speeches. And I've met so many people. But the people are so incredible that I've been saying make America great again and it's going to be greater than ever before. That's the kind of potential we have. Greater then every before. So I want to thank everybody. I love you all. Again, South Carolina we will never forget you. We will never forget you. We will never, ever forget South Carolina. We will never forget our great volunteers. We love our volunteers. We'll never forget all of the people that have helped us so much. My family and folks, let's go.
Let's have a big win in Nevada. Let's have a big win at SEC . Let's put this thing away and let's make America great again. Thank you very much. Thank you very much.

Thank you, everybody.


This is so - so incredible. 
 We - we have had, no matter where we go - you know, it's a movement, folks. This is a movement.

 No matter where we go, it's amazing. We go to Dallas. We go to Oklahoma. We go all over. We went to, the other night, Iowa - packed. Every place - New Hampshire, packed. Every place we go to, it's like this. It's amazing. And just great, great people.

 And they actually had to tell over 3,000 people, "go home." We'll come back. We'll do another one. But they had to go home. Would you like to leave and we'll let them come in? No?

 I don't think so, but we - they turned away a lot of people, which is too bad, actually. So maybe next time. I don't know. I think this is the largest room. I know it's a record for the room.

 You know, it has to be a record because every inch of the room is taken with people, and they're standing. They're not sitting. So that's great. I love - we love setting records. We want the country to set records, right?

 So, you know, I - I do this, and I love to do it. And I talk about our success because that's ultimately what it's all about. I think we're going to do fantastically well in Iowa. I really think we're going to do great there. And I could say, "Oh, gee, if we came in the top four of five." I'm not - I'm looking to win everything. We want to run the table. We want to run it, because that sends a signal.
 And, you know, we've been a little bit - we had to respond to Hillary. She came out with that - she came out - remember, she wrote - she said, "He's got a - he's demonstrated a penchant" - I demonstrated - "a penchant for sexism." Can you believe it? Me? Nobody respects women more than Donald Trump. That I can tell you.

 And, you know, when she said that, I had no choice, because I didn't start it. I had no choice. And I did have to mention her husband's situation. OK?

 And that is now the biggest story on television by a factor of 10. So, we have to do it. You can't let people push you around. You can't let people tell lies. You can't do it.
 You know, it's interesting. One of the polls came out from CNBC and they said that if it's Trump against Hillary in the election, it will be the greatest voter turnout in the history of this country. I can see that. I can see it.

 And they said all of these people that are going to come in new, that never vote - they never vote, they don't care - they're going to mostly - I'll tell you what, they're going to vote for Trump. That's why they're coming in, because they're so fed up with the system - this corrupt, horrible system. They're fed up with it and they're fed up with those guys back there, the media.
 TRUMP: They are the worst.

 No, no, no. They're fed up. They're fed up with the media. I mean, I've got - and you know, not all bad, but there's so much dishonesty in the media. And I like to call it out. And one of the things that's really been amazing to me, and such - it's been so beautiful to watch - the level of genius in the public. They get it, you know? They really get it. They want to marginalize us, they want to do all of this and they want to make everybody look like, "Oh, gee."
 The level of genius - they fully understand. They know they're crooked, they know they're dishonest and they really - otherwise, who gets worse publicity than me?

 And yet, I see a poll at 42 percent. And you know, you're talking about 15, 16 people, started with 17. How are you? Started with 17 people. And you know, I'd be happy with 42 if we had three, OK? Not thrilled, I'd like to be that - over that 50 mark, but I think we're doing really well.
 And you know, it's interesting, but the debates - OK. So the debates - thank - I love you too, darling.

 I love you. I do. I love you. I love every - you know what? The rooms, no matter where, whether it's stadiums or big ballrooms like this one, it's amazing, and there's love in the room. And I told - the other night, I said and a friend of mine, very, very successful guy who I would love to have negotiating against China. That's what we need, not these hacks that we have.

 No, no. I have guys …

 Carl Icahn endorsed me. Great business man. We have - I have great, great business people that want to be involved. And we're going to use - we have the best. We have the best in the world. We don't use them. We use political hacks, we use special interest people that really don't care about the country, they care about their deals.
 This is going to change so fast. You know, last year, $500 billion trade deficit with China. Think about it. You know what $500 billion is? You do - you do $100 bills, you would fill the room to the ceiling, $500 billion deficit - trade deficit with China. What are we? Are we - yes, I guess the answer is certainly let's not blame us.
 Our leaders are stupid and - and/or - you have to say and/or they have deals, because what's happened is all of this money is being given to them by special interests, by all of these people, including lobbyists, and these lobbyists make our leaders do - our leaders, can you believe our leaders? This is what - but they make the leaders of our country do things that they don't even want to do because they've given them tens and tens and tens of millions of dollars.
 I look at this guy Jeb Bush. He spent $59 million on his campaign and he is down in the grave. He is nowhere. No, no. Think of it. It's got to be much more than that. It was actually $59 million a while ago. Every time I turn on an add, I see an ad about Trump. I mean, it's not that bad an ad either. It's like - you know.

 If you're going to do an ad, do an ad. But he's a low-energy person. Let's face it. We don't need low-energy. We need lots of energy.

 But he spent - think of it. Think of it. He spent $59 million. I spent nothing, right? Nothing.

 Now, I'm going to be spending. You probably saw I'm going to spend - now, we're going to start spending a lot of money because I don't want to take any chances. You know, it's - I love getting up - and for the last couple of months, I have been leading from practically the time I announced, right? And for the last - and leading a lot. I'm going to go over that because I go over (ph) polls. I love polls. I love polls.

 Now, when they - if they turn negative, I don't like them.

 And I promise, if they turn negative, I'm not going to be talking about them. In fact, I get criticized all the time. You're always talking about your polls. One of these guys just got two. He's at two. I'm at 42. And one of these guys who's at two said, "He always talks about his polls and I don't." I wouldn't either if I had two, I swear I wouldn't.

 I wouldn't. I wouldn't do it at all. But you know, I love to tell the story where I have spent nothing and Bush has spent $59 million, but much higher than that. That's just - you know, because I see since then - I mean, just - you can't turn on this television without these commercials. And Fox - every two minutes it's a commercial on Trump.
 You know what he did? It's false advertising. So I killed him in the debate. According to Reuters, according to everybody, Drudge, who's an amazing guy, by the way. If you don't know Drudge - Matt Drudge. Right? He's a great guy. But Drudge, 46 percent. At 46 percent, you have 15 people. Now, if you noticed a couple have dropped out. A couple or more.
 But 15, 16 people - 46 percent. Time magazine, 49 percent. Think of it. Slate, 51 percent. U.S. News and World Report - 69 percent said I won the debate. I wont the debate, right?

 PBS, Public Broadcasting System - 69 percent said Trump won.

 No, you know, it is amazing. We have Washington Times at 62 percent. CBS, 59 percent. Fox, 62 percent - Fox Las Vegas, 62 percent. So, they all say - then they go back home, after the debate. I like to see how did I do? Did I look good? Looking good is very important, right? Sometimes, it is not as much like what you say, it's how did you look?
 Oh, I looked good, didn't sound too good, but that is OK. You wonder if that is a good trait. But I go home, and I watch, and the pundits will say - and they can't totally kill me, because we know it is happening, we know what's happening - well, Mr. Trump was OK tonight. He was - I won every single online poll, I won.
 And then, here's Bush. So, Bush does an ad. And he takes me - and he was talking about, you know, something, and manage - and then I killed him. I mean, he - by the way, I met 69 percent, he is at 1 percent, he got. He came in last.

 He takes the ad - and I shouldn't even talk about him. He's down to two or three - I - but it bothers me when I see a guy spending, you know, $60 million on ads against me, a lot of it, right? I say, why is he doing this? Doesn't he have something better, he should go home.

 Just relax. You know, honestly, he should go home and relax. He shouldn't be wasting his time. But it does. I say, why is this guy spending all this money? Now he is spending it actually against a couple of other guys, they were also very weak and somewhere - but here is my ad. So, he made a statement, and after that, his spin people said, oh, he was great. He took on Trump, he took on Trump. I'm standing here, he's over here. Took on Trump, he made a statement that was written by his pollster. You know? So, he would remember (ph) it.
 He said, "Mr. Trump, why don't you this?" I said, OK. Then I gave him an answer. I said, "Jeb, I'm at 42, you are at 2. Right? It is a simple answer. You started off here, right next to me, and then you were there, then you were there, by the next time, you are going to be off the stage. Right?

 No, no, it's true. And then - and then - and that was it. And so I responded. So, he asked me a question, question was fine. You know, professionally written. So, he asked me a question, good. I give him an answer, I blow him away. Right. Everyone says Trump won the debate. Everybody. And hat is it. So, the ad is him asking the question and I'm standing there like this, because I haven't - in fact, you see in one of them, I'm just about ready to open my mouth.
 But he doesn't let me respond. That is almost false advertising, isn't it? You know? So, I mentioned it, Hillary is a disaster. I mean, Hillary.
 Hillary is controlled by her money. So is Jeb. So is - by the way, I'm the only one self-funding my campaign. I'm self-funding.

 You know, one of the things that makes me happy. I heard one of my commentators this morning, said, "you know, I've been watching this stuff for 50 years and I've never seen anything like what has happened with Trump. One of them actually said - one of them - I'm special. You're special. I like you. I'm special.
 Isn't that nice? That's a very - every once in a while, somebody can say something that hits you. Where are you? Who said that? Wow. So nice. Thank you. That is a nice one. That's like, you know, very once in a while, there is a statement that is either nice or brutal. I think low-energy was a brutal statement, right?
 Low-energy can be applied to Hillary. I just don't like to use the same thing twice on one of my enemies. Right? Because I consider them enemies. We view this as war. Don't we view this as war? It's war.
 It's war. And so, you don't like to use it. I hate to give it up. What?
 QUESTION: How are you going to help my little girl (ph), daughter? TRUMP: Oh, we are going to help your daughter. We are going to help the country, that's called helping the daughter. We are going to help your country. So, here is the story. So, we are in a situation where we have incompetent leadership, where our trade deals are killing us, our military is not prepared. General Odierno when he left, just recently, he said that we are less prepared than at any time that he can remember. And I think he went back tot he beginning, but let's say second World War. OK? That's enough.
 And we should be very prepared now, because the world hates us. She has done a terrible job as secretary of State. Think of it. Putin comes out, he said, Donald Trump is brilliant, he is doing an amazing job, and he is leading the pack. OK, that's nice.
 TRUMP: And she and my opponents - oh, isn't it terrible that Putin said - wouldn't it be nice if we could get along with the world? Wouldn't it be? Seriously. No, no, wouldn't it be nice?

 I mean, they want me to refute his statement. How dare you say I'm brilliant? How dare - that's - who's going to do that? And by the way, if he said it about anyone of them, they would have been very happy.
 But the point is, we have to get along. The world has blown up around Barack Obama.
 Now, I don't know if you saw his recent release. They were talking about the Department of State, State Department, and they said very strongly, you know, the things that they've done. Well, they couldn't find it because what have they done that's good? And they said bringing peace to Syria. Did you see that?
 So instead of saying they made a mistake - call it a typo, they made a mistake - they're trying to justify it. Well, we meant we're working on it. Can you believe - bringing peace to Syria. The world is blowing up, the migration in Syria - they say one of their achievements for the year is bringing peace to Syria, and the whole world's talking about it. It's - the level of stupidity is incredible. I'm telling you. I used to use the word incompetent, now I just call them stupid.

 I went to an Ivy League school, I'm very highly educated. I know words, I had the best words. I have - but there's no better word than stupid.

 Right? There is none. There is none.

 There's no - there's no - there's no word like that. So we are going to turn things around. But - and if we have Hillary - I've got to tell you. I just saw where for the last week she's been hitting me really hard with the women card, OK? Really hard. And I had to say OK, that's enough, that's enough. And we did a strong number. She's not going to win. Any by the way, I love the concept - I love, love, love having a woman president. Can't be her. She's horrible. She's horrible.
 (AUDIENCE MEMBERS SHOUTING)
 TRUMP: And you know really don't - I'll tell you who does not like - yeah, we'll get Ivanka. Good. Let's do Ivanka.

 But I'll tell you who doesn't like Hillary are women. Women don't like Hillary.

 I see it all the time. And always so theatrical; Mr. Trump said this and that and this. And you just - I actually - I shouldn't do it. I just have to turn off the television so many times. She just gives me a headache.

 But you know - although I think last night I gave her a big headache.

 I can imagine - I can imagine those discussions. But you have to hit back hard, and you can't let them push you around. And today, she gave a speech and she never even mentioned my name. You know, in the debate I was mentioned nine times, I mean everything. All of them. But her. I was mentioned nine times, none of the other candidates were mentioned. And then she came out with the sexism, which is so nonsense. And - but she's playing that card. And then I had to hit her back, so I hit her back and I talked about her husband and the abuse of women and the tremendous abuse - no, it's tremendous abuse.
 I mean, you look at it, it's tremendous abuse. And I talked about that. And now today, the television is going crazy, and she gets up, makes a speech and doesn't even mention anything about me with sexism or anything else. I wonder why - I wonder why.

 And remember this; it's really important. A poll just came out where we're tied, another one came out a couple of weeks ago, Fox, where I'm leading by four or five points against her individually. We're doing great. I haven't even focused on her yet.
 Look at the people I've focused on. I don't want to really knock them, I don't want to mention their names. But, you know, of those people that are all gone, they were all people that attacked me. Wouldn't it be nice if our country could have that same thing? You attack and they're, boom, gone. And if we could do it verbally -

 - you know, if we could do it verbally that's even better, right? You know, who wants to use our military? By the way, we are going to build the strongest, the best, the most powerful military ever. Ever. Ever.

 And we're going to take care of our vets, we're going to take care of our vets -

 - because they are being treated horribly. But we're going to build the strongest, most powerful military and -
 (AUDIENCE MEMBERS SHOUTING)
 TRUMP: - let me just tell you - let me just tell you a little secret. It's the cheapest thing we can do. We're never going to have to use it. I don't think we're going to have to use it. Don't forget they talk about my tone. I remember when Jeb and Hillary the same day - Mr. Trump's tone is not nice. They're chopping off Christians' heads in Syria and other places and they want me to have a nice tone. I'm supposed to be, oh, isn't life wonderful, OK?
 TRUMP: Look, we've got to be tough, we've got to be smart, we've got to have heart too. We've got to have heart, we've got to take care of people. We've got to fix our health care program. This Obamacare is a disaster. You people know.

 You people know. Obamacare is a total catastrophe. It's going to be repealed and replaced. It will die in '17 anyway. I don't know if you heard what's happening. But it's so bad, all the people that they didn't think were signing up are signing up.
 And the other people that are really paying for it are not signing up. And your rates are going up 25 percent, 35 percent, 45 percent. Your deductibles are so high that unless you get hit by a tractor, you're never going to be able to use your deductible. You're never going to be able to use it. So Obamacare is a disaster. We are going to repeal it, we are going to replace it.
 There are so many great things we can do on health care. So many good things.

 TRUMP: And it will cost you much less money, and it will be great. I mean, you are signing in programs, things that you will never, ever use, You know that. And you are paying for it. And you will never ever use them. So we will get that straightened out. We are going to straighten a lot of things. We are going to straighten out Common Core. Common Core is dead. It's going to be dead.

 TRUMP: When I look at parents and I see local parents in Iowa and New Hampshire and South Carolina, I went to a school and I saw the parents, they love their children. They want that - they want education. They love - they don't care about money, they don't care about anything. They love their children and it's local.
 And they get together and they do wonderful programs. They are smart people as opposed to getting it done by bureaucrats that are getting big, fat checks in Washington. I mean, we have such talent in this country and we don't use it. So, Obamacare, dead. Common core, gone. We are going to get rid of it. Department of Education, we are going to get rid of it.

 TRUMP: We are bringing education to a local level. One thing on education. So, in the world, we are ranked number 28. There are third world countries that are ranked better than us in education and many other things. And yet, per pupil, we are number 1, by far - there is nobody close. Number two isn't even close.
 So we spend more money for pupil than any country in the world and we are ranked number 28 which is way down at the bottom, essentially. I mean, it's - can you imagine we are ranked number 28 and we are number 1? And that's what I do like saying about my campaign, I spent less money than anybody else and I have the best results.
 I'm number one by a lot and I spent no money. I mean, my plane cost me some money, but I spent no ads. Took a little radio ad in Iowa. But I didn't do that - I took - I think the station is so lovely if you want to know the truth. But I spent essentially no money.
 And then you have all these other guys spending vast - and they like the way the United States is run. Now, why would we put a guy like Jeb, like some of the others. It's not only Jeb Bush. They spend money. I see Rubio on the ads all day long.
 You know, the black background. He's got like a black thing. He should have put something like that behind him, right? Right there, the flag.

 TRUMP: No, no. And I like him. I think he is a nice guy. But I see these ads with the backdrop and it is just somber. It's not - I don't think it's good. So, think of it. I spent no money and I'm number one. Others spent - they will have spent hundreds of millions of dollars and they are not even in the race. That's what we need for our country. What? OK. I've got 15,000, I don't know what the hell he means by that but that's OK. So, but I think he's a fan. I don't think he's a - are you a protester? No. OK. No body likes Trump. OK. He's not a protester. I love you.

 TRUMP: You know, the only time - don't worry about it. The only time the cameras focus on the crowd is when we have a protester. Cause I always have - like, look at this room, packed. I always have the biggest crowds.
 And I go home and my wife said were there many people? I watched you on television tonight. I said, I had 20,000 people. She said, they didn't show it. They have it right on your face. So I have 20,000 people. I have 20,000 in Oklahoma, 35,000 in Mobile, Alabama. Nobody knows. Because those cameras stay right in your face and I think they can't move.
 You know, I think they might be fixed because modern cameras maybe - except every time there is a guy that stands up protesting, you know, they are on drugs or something, cause some of those guys, it's like. They don't even know what the hell they are doing there, all the sudden, the cameras swerve and make perfect shots.
 And I like it because then it shows how big the crowds are. So, you know. Some time I think I'm going to put in some false protesters. I'll put in some friendly protesters. It's the only way I'm going to be able to get the crowd in.
 So when we started, I talked about trade. I talked about the border. I talked about a lot of things. And I started on June 16th and - in Trump Tower, the famous escalator ride. And it takes guts to run for president. I'll tell you, you know, it's like, I've never did this before.
 And, you know, then they tell you on a debate we had the largest debate. We have the largest audience in the history of cable television. Then CNN a couple of weeks later had 23 million. Fox had 24 million. CNN had 23 million - the largest audience in the history of CNN.
 Now, they're there - the cameras are on live right now. I mean, you know. So, the largest audience in the history of (inaudible).
 Now, the debates used to be, if you go back four years or eight years, you know, whenever the cycles came up, nobody even wanted - they didn't want the debates. I think they were forced to take them for licensing. Nobody wanted the debates. They drew nothing, but now they're drawing 24 million. Now they want to have more debates - "Oh, can we have more? Can we have more?" Can they go three hours?
 Do you remember when they had the one go three hours? I said, no, I'm not doing three hours. It's too long. Who wants - I could stand up here for 50 hours, but who the hell wants to sit home watching three hours of the stuff, right?
 "Mr. Trump, you have 30 seconds. What would you do about ISIS?" Oh, great. And by the way, that question - I hate those questions. You know why? Because I want to be unpredictable. I don't want to tell ISIS what I'm going to do to knock the hell out of them.

 Remember, I said very strongly - (inaudible) the oil for what, four years? You've been watching. I mean, four years. I've been "get the oil, get the oil, get the oil." Because who's going to get the oil? Iran is taking over Iraq. We made a deal for Iran, done by some of the dumbest people on earth, on our side. We gave them everything. They - we don't even get our prisoners back.
 And now Iran wants to start negotiating separately for them. Can you believe it? I go crazy. We would have gotten them back. All you had to do was say, "We want our prisoners back." They would have said no. I would have said, "I want them back; you don't understand me. I want them back." They would have said, "No, we won't do that." I would have said, "Bye-bye," and I would have left. Then I would have doubled up the sanctions. And I guarantee you...

 ... I guarantee you that within 24 hours, they would have called back and they'll say, "You've got your prisoners; can we talk?"
 And I would have never given them $150 billion. I would have never given them the money. I would have never give - they're using it - they don't have to make nuclear. They can buy it. Why are they going to make it? Then we have the nuclear, where they have self- inspections. How about the area - you know, the big area? They don't want us there. Oh, I wonder why. They don't want us there. So they self-inspect, OK?
 Then they have the 24-day inspection, but the self-inspection is the beauty. "We think you're making nuclear weapons here." "Well, let us go check, Mr. President, we'll check."

 "No, sir, we're not making nuclear weapons. Nobody - no, we're not; we would never do a thing like that."
 These are people that have deceived us. They've lied to us. They're a terrorist state. But - and I used to say it's the worst deal that I've ever seen negotiated. And by the way, just to finish prisoners. So they'd come back; we get our prisoners. But then when I hear the other day that now this deal is done. It's all done. And now I hear they want to negotiate to get - and what do they say? They said very strongly, they said, "We are going to want a lot for the prisoners. That's out - we're starting off; we're going to want a lot."
 Now, we've already taken off the sanctions. They're already rich as hell. What - what's going on there? That's why I say, I mean, some people say it's worst than stupidity. There's something going on that we don't know about. I mean, honest. And you almost think - I'm not saying that, and I'm not a conspiracy person. As you said, "We are; we're saying it."

 Half the people in this room are saying it. I'm trying to be - you know, I'm just hoping they're just stupid people, OK?

 Which they are. Or there's something going on. Because it's - it's inconceivable. You know, do you ever see where some things are so bad that it can't be - that nobody can do what they did, right? Nobody.
 So, Iran now wants to negotiate separately for the (inaudible). In other words, that deal is done; now we want to start all over again. And they want a lot. "We want a lot." And I just - I want to just shoot the television, you know? Because they would have had it just by saying.
 And, you know, when they asked Kerry and Obama, the deal was made. Everybody knows it's a horrible deal. It's going to need to - it's going to lead to tremendous nuclear proliferation, and they're so rich now. You know, they became - $150 billion - they became so rich. And many other things that you don't even know about. Most people don't even know what the agreement says.
 TRUMP: But I'll tell you what, when you look at what we're doing, we're not going to have - if we keep going like this, folks, we're not going to have a country left. We're not going to have a country. We're not going to have a country.
 And we're like a dumping ground for the world. We're a dumping ground. They want to take these migrants - the migrants, you know, and I feel terrible about the migration, caused by Hillary Clinton and Barack Obama. They're the ones that caused it. They go into Libya. They knocked the hell out of Gadhafi. OK, so Gadhafi - they backed rebels who end up killing the ambassador and the other young people.
 You know the ambassador was riding in a jeep, one of our jeeps, of course, a military jeep, holding the Libyan flag and you know, freedom, freedom, freedom. And then gets killed by the same people. So, we backed people that turned out to be far worse than Gadhafi.
 Look at what we did in Iraq. Look at what we did in Iraq. I mean, what the hell did we get? We spent $2 trillion, and that was as a year and a half ago. I keep saying two or three, it's a lot more than that. We spent $2 trillion, we have thousands of deaths, and I'm not even talking other side.
 You are talking about hundreds of thousands, maybe millions. You have thousands of deaths. We have wounded warriors, who I love, all of. These guys are the toughest - these are the greatest people.

 TRUMP: You know, these are the greatest people. And then what happens? We leave, and we have a president that announces the date of when we are leaving. So, I said, man, if I'm the enemy, I'm just going to go wait for 18 months right?
 He gave a date. We are leaving Iraq, we will be gone by such and such a time. I said, I'm just sitting there watching and I'm saying, man, that's really stupid. Because, believe me, the enemy doesn't want to be killed. You know, you hear so much, oh they want to go with the virgins up to wherever they go, right?
 They don't. They want to live. And they want to take care of their families, always their families. You remember that, because their families know what's going on OK? You think their wives don't know what they are planning? You think their kids don't know exactly what daddy is doing when daddy is going to fly into the World Trade Center? You think they don't know? They know exactly what's going on. Remember that. And frankly, I think they have more love for their family's lives than they do for their own lives, OK. But they still want to live. So here is Obama, gives an exact date. He gives an exact date and so they pull back.
 And everyone says, oh, we are doing so well. Look, we're doing so well. Why should they fight when they know, in 18 months, they can go in and take the place? So what happens? So we have ISIS taking a lot of oil. I said take the oil. Remember when we left, I was opposed to going in because I said you're going to destabilize the Middle East.
 Because you had Iraq and you had Iran. And I said, they fight, they're always fighting for decades and decades, for generations. They fight, that's what they do. They fight. How we ever got involved in this mess is hard to believe. They fight and they were equal militarily. They go this way, 10 feet. They go this way, 10 feet. Then they rest a couple of years, then they start fighting again.
 Then Saddam Hussein throws a little gas. Everyone goes crazy. Oh, it's because (ph) of gas. They go back and forth. It's the same. And they were stabilized. And I said, if you go after one or the other, in this case Iraq, you're going to destabilize the Middle East. That's what going to happen. You're going to destabilize the Middle East. And that's exactly what happened. We totally destabilized the Middle East.
 We have now migrations ,largely because of what's happened afterwards. You know Iraq was horrible. It was stupid to go in and we should have never gone in. But we shouldn't have gotten out the way we went out. And we shouldn't have given dates. I mean, I would have probably said we are going to stay forever. And they would have said, oh, man.
 And then keep going, keep going and eventually they would get tired and say, this guy is crazy. I mean, he's never going to leave and you'll make a deal. But when you announce you are leaving in 18 months or whatever the hell he said, they just pull back. And then as soon as we left, they come in OK?
 So they have the oil. You know who the biggest benefactor of the oil is right? China. Always China. I love China. I love Mexico. Their leaders are too smart for us. We have no border. We will build a wall. Mexico will pay for the wall by the way.

 TRUMP: We're building a wall, we are going to have a border. And people are going to come into our country, but they are going to come in through a legal process. They're not coming in the way they're coming in now, just walking in like nothing.
 They are going to come in, but they are going to come through a legal process. So, with Iraq, so we give them the date and they take over. We didn't take the year. So for four years, I have been talking about it. Then because of Paris, all of sudden they start bombing the oil.
 But I didn't want to just bomb the oil. I wanted to take oil. They're bombing. You know, we are bombing. Great. What's going to happen after that? So we're bombing. And, you know, we are not really bombing it, because they are still selling it.
 TRUMP: I said, how could they keep selling it? Obama does not want to hit them too hard because he is afraid he is going to pollute the atmosphere. No, this is serious. Now think of it. He talks about the carbon footprint and yet he will fly a very old Air Force one, an old Boeing 747, with the old engines and you know, spewing stuff.
 So, he's got a problem with the carbon footprint. You can't use hair spray because hair spray is going to affect the ozone. I'm trying to figure out. Let's see, I'm in my room in New York City and I want to put a little spray so that I can -


 - right? Right? But I hear where they don't want me to use hair spray, they want me to use the pump because the other one which I really like better than going bing, bing, bing -

 - and then it comes out in big globs, right, and you - it's stuck in your hair and you say oh my God, I've got to take a shower again. My hair's all screwed up, right?

 I want to use hair spray. They say don't use hair spray, it's bad for the ozone. So I'm sitting in this concealed apartment, this concealed unit - you know, I really do live in a very nice apartment, right?

 But it's sealed, it's beautiful. I don't think anything gets out. And I'm not supposed to be using hair spray. But think of it. So Obama's always talking about the global warming, that global warming is our biggest and most dangerous problem, OK? No, no, think of it. I mean, even if you're a believer in global warming, ISIS is a big problem, Russia's a problem, China's a problem. We've got a lot of problems. By the way, the maniac in North Korea is a problem. He actually has nuclear weapons, right? That's a problem.
 We've got a lot of problems. We've got a lot of problems. That's right, we don't win anymore. He said we want to win. We don't win anymore. We're going to win a lot - if I get elected, we're going to win a lot.

 We're going to win so much - we're going to win a lot. We're going to win a lot. We're going to win so much you're all going to get sick and tired of winning. You're going to say oh no, not again. I'm only kidding. You never get tired of winning, right? Never.

 But think of it. So Obama's talking about all of this with the global warming and the - a lot of it's a hoax, it's a hoax. I mean, it's a money-making industry, OK? It's a hoax, a lot of it. And look, I want clean air and I want clean water. That's my global - I want clean, clean crystal water and I want clean air. And we can do that, but we don't have to destroy our businesses, we don't have to destroy our -
 And by the way, China isn't abiding by anything. They're buying all of our coal; we can't use coal anymore essentially. They're buying our coal and they're using it. Now when you talk about the planet, it's so big out there - we're here, they're there, it's like they're our next door neighbor, right, in terms of the universe. Miss Universe, by the way, I made a great deal when I sold - oh did I get rich.

 That was a great deal. You know, they broke my choppers on that. They said he talks about illegal immigration, we're not going to put him on television. First of all, Univision is being sued like crazy; you wouldn't believe it. And NBC, I made a great deal with them, just like an amazing deal, far more than I would have ever gotten - I mean, I made an unbelievable deal - far more than I ever would have gotten if I said I think I'm going to sell it if times were normal, right? Isn't it amazing the way that stuff can work out?
 But I love Miss Universe and I love the universe. But think of it. So China is spewing up all this stuff and we're holding back. And with China - you know, we signed these agreements where we have to do it now, they have to do it within 30 or 35 years. I don't think they're going to be doing it.
 It's like Japan. If somebody attacks Japan, we have to immediately go and start World War III, OK? If we get attacked, Japan doesn't have to help us. Somehow, that doesn't sound so fair. Does that sound good?
 AUDIENCE MEMBER: No!
 TRUMP: So South Korea - I order televisions, I order thousands of televisions a year. I order televisions because I have a lot of stuff and I like nice brand new - they're all made in South Korea, most - other than Sony, and Sony, in all fairness, has lost its way. But a lot of them - Samsung, all of them. I mean, they're all pretty much - all of them, right? I think just about. But I order thousands of televisions, they're all from South Korea. So we have 28,000 people on the border separating South Korea from this maniac in North Korea, we get nothing. What do - we get nothing. They're making a fortune. It's an economic behemoth.
 A lot of you don't know we protect Germany. Germany! Mercedes Benz, how many people have a Mercedes Benz? We protect Germany. It's an economic behemoth.
 We protect Saudi Arabia. They were, during the good oil days - now it's probably half, which is fine. But during the good old - they were making a billion - listen to this - a billion dollars a day, and we protect them. Our military - they pay us peanuts, like nothing. And then if we want to buy - we want to move to another location, well, that's very expensive if we do that. We want - they charge us rent?
 I mean, look. We are run by people that are so bad, they're so out of their league - and I see it, I see it on the stage. You know, they're - a lot of them are nice people. You know, a lot of people think I don't like these people. I do like them. But they don't have business sense, they don't have business ability, they don't have common sense. They're politicians, they're all talk, they're no action.
 When I say...

 ... folks, when I say, "We're going to build a wall." Most of them say, "You can't build a wall - build a wall." In China 2,000 years ago, they built the Great Wall of China, which is bigger than any wall we're thinking about, OK? The Great Wall of China goes 18,000 miles. We have 2,000 miles of which we only need 1,000 miles, because you have a lot of natural barriers, right, that are extremely tough to get across. We have 1,000 miles.
 So, China has 18,000 or 13,000 miles, and we have 1,000 miles. We have modern cranes. We have Caterpillar tractors - I want to use Caterpillar; I don't want to use Komatsu.

 Made in America.

 Even my hats, they're made in America. It wasn't easy to find a guy that could do those hats. You know what I'm talking about. I see so many knock-offs of my hat, right? "Make America Great Again." I see these things that are out of plastic. They're out of all sorts of crap. Mine are made in America. And honestly, they do a great job, but they don't produce as many as I'd like because, frankly, there's a big - I mean, it's amazing. Those hats are amazing. But I wanted to have it made. And you know why I wanted it - I wanted it, anyway, but I also knew that as soon as the hats came out, and other things - we have a website - as soon as the hats came out, I knew the press would be calling. And it's true. First hour when the hats were announced, I get a call from the New York Times. "Mr. Trump, where are those hats made?" I said, "America."

 I knew it. I knew it. Because as you know, if I would have said China, I would have been in big, big trouble. But they're being knocked off all over the world. I mean, I see hats - they're like helmets. I see them all. But what are you going to do?
 But here's the story. We've got to build a wall. So when I talk and when I'm up on the stage with these guys, these people - wonderful people - and a very nice woman, Carly. She's a nice woman. When I'm up on the stage with them, they think I'm crazy when I say "Mexico" - I'm saying, "We're going to build a wall; it's going to be a great wall; it's going to be real wall. See this ceiling? This ceiling is peanuts compared to the height of the wall I'm talking about."
 I'm talking about a van to get up there. They're not coming down because it's too dangerous.

 All right? Did you ever see what they do now? We have these little walls. They build ramps. They build a ramp. I say, "Wouldn't it be cheaper just to knock the wall down and just..." And then they drive over it with jeeps loaded up with drugs. Do you see this? They build ramps. There was a picture in Time magazine. It's a ramp - a little ramp that goes over the wall. So, they have a jeep - over, down, bump, make money. We get the drugs. Think of it. We - "build a wall" is right. You've got to build a wall.
 We get the drugs. They get the cash. No so good, right? We don't like that deal. Our politicians don't know - they don't know.
 So when I say "Mexico's going to pay for it," these guys on the stage with me, they're not business people. They don't understand. Mexico makes a fortune off the United States. Number one, we give them a lot of money. But in addition to that, they're taking our businesses. They're making - you talk about a trade deficit. I'll tell you what, Mexico in a certain way is in a mini-version the new China. Mexico is making an absolute fortune - peanuts, compared to the cost of the wall.
 Let's say the cost of the wall is $10 billion. That's a good - I can do great job at $10 billion. I think we'll have a lot of money left over. Somebody else would - and by the way, 20 years ago, they wanted to build a wall. People that are opposed to it now, they wanted to stop and they wanted to build a wall. You know one of the reasons they didn't build the wall? Because of the Environmental Protection Agency, they couldn't get an environmental impact study approved. Can you believe it? Because there was a toad or a turtle or a snake or something was in the way.
 Now, think of it. In China, in the South China Sea, there were these low-level land masses that were covered by water, but pretty close to the top. China sends in massive excavators and they're (inaudible). They're building military fortresses in the South China Sea. And a friend of mine, who is one of the biggest and richest people in China - he's a great guy. They're great people. They're fine. They're just too smart. I mean, the leaders are too smart for our people.
 They won't be too smart when I put my people there.

 When they call up, "We'd like to speak to the donor that is negotiating it." "No, no. The donor now is Carl Icahn. You're going to speak to Carl Icahn." You know Carl - great businessman. You have so many people - they call all these business people - call. So, a friend of mine, so I call him, I say, "You're actually doing that." And then jokingly, I said, "How long did it take to get started? Did you have to get an environmental impact study approved in order to excavate?"
 He looked at me, goes, "I - I hope you're kidding when you say that.
 They conceived of the idea and they started digging four hours later, OK? There is no, you know, go through 25 years of environmental impact, you are going to hurt the snail. You're going to hurt this. You are going to - they are doing a big thing.
 They excavated - massive, massive - take a look, massive. The biggest excavation. They are ripping the hell out of that ocean. They are ripping it and they are taking their dirt and they are putting it - and they're building air fields and they're building forts.
 We couldn't do it because, just like I said for the law. Legitimately, they could not get an environmental impact statement. Now, that's probably not the only reason it didn't happen. I heard their costs were too high. With me, that's easy.
 You know, I'm doing the old post office or watch (ph) you (ph). I'm under budget, I'm ahead of schedule. Hey, look at the campaign. The guy's at $59 million and he's down at the bottom. I'm nothing and I'm at the top. It's the same thing.

 TRUMP: I actually said - it's funny. The other day I got this great review. They said trump is a great speaker. The crowd is spellbound. But he has one problem. And I'm reading, and I want to see. The problem is, he speaks through the Applause. In other words, like I say that, you applaud, I start talking you finish your Applause. And you know why? Because I'm so excited, because we have so much potential. It's true. 
 TRUMP: I don't want to wait for your freaking Applause. We have - I have so many - we have so much potential. There are so many things to do. I don't really sort of want to wait. I want to do it. And I just noticed, I did it again. You were getting ready to give a big Applause, because you like that, and I'm speaking. I killed the Applause. But he is right. But except, I'm not a speaker. What I am is a doer. I get things done.

 TRUMP: So, when the people up on the stage with me - and Hillary, Hillary doesn't have a clue. By the way, you talk about low energy. She has lower energy than Jeb Bush, which is hard to believe. She does. And I'll tell you and I've been saying it. And maybe it's rude, maybe it is not. But it doesn't matter. We have a much bigger problem. We have to save our country.
 So, if I'm rude and if people think I'm rude - I'm actually a nice person. I have a big heart. I want to help people. I want to help the migration. I want to do a safe zone in Syria. I don't want them coming here. We don't know who these people are. They are undocumented.

 TRUMP: And we should do a safe zone over there. We should have the Gulf states - Saudi Arabia and these states they are not spending. They have got to spend. They have to pay. You know, we are protecting them. We're doing - they wouldn't be there for two minutes if we weren't protecting them. They have to start paying. They are not taking anybody, OK?
 How about Germany taking millions of migrants. Can you believe what she is doing to that country? And she was the person of the year and I wasn't. Everybody said Trump was supposed to.
 (BOOING)
 Hey, what are you going to do. I think she has made a terrible mistake. We will find out. Time will tell. They have tremendous crime problems. I think she has made a tremendous mistake. But what I like is in Syria, with other people's money, meaning the Gulf states and others and Germany and others.
 Because, look, Germany is paying a fortune to accept all these people. They'll give us the money. We do a massive safe zone. And then eventually when this whole catastrophe straightens out, which I will probably be able to get it straightened out, I understand this now.
 But once it's straightened out, they could go home to their country, you know, to their area. It is interesting, I have thousands of people that work for me. Thousands. And I have people that come from far - they are all here legally, don't worry about it. I use E- verify. But I have people - oh, they go and check. These guys go check.
 They went into the old post office checking everybody who walked their dog, are you hear illegally? They said they found one person out of hundreds and hundreds. I don't believe it. But, you know, it is possible somebody slipped - hey, we do have 11 million people in the country. And it is probably a much higher number than that, OK? It is probably a much higher number.
 But we have to do something about it and we are going to. So, I just want to finish by saying this. Look, we have a situation that is out of control. Our country is a dumping ground for the rest of the world. We are laughed at by the rest of the world.
 And when I started this journey, and it is a journey, and I do love you people. You're amazing people. And by the way, you are so smart. A lot of times, they will say, well Mr. Trump's people are blue-collar. I love blue-collar. I'm honored by that.
 But they are not blue-collar. We have blue-collar and we have executives and we have young people. They say the audience is old. It's not older. The audience is young. The other night in Iowa, I told that, and I said, we have so many young people and the place erupted. They are all young people. We have an amazing thing happening, it's just...

 TRUMP: Look, that's their way of marginalizing, not even me, they are marginalizing you. It is disgusting. But when I started this journey and that's what it is, it's a journey and it's a movement that's taking place. It's a movement. Remember the old days? Silent majority? It's not right. It's a noisy majority. People are angry. It's a noisy majority. These aren't silent people anymore. I go to people - you can't even hear.
 This is an amazing thing that's happened. I received a call from one of the biggest reporters, who happens to be liberal, but that's OK. (inaudible) a couple of them, right? But, a guy who's really respected, recently, and he said, "How does it feel?" I said, "How does what feel?" He said, "What you have done has never been done in the history of politics in the United States." I mean, even CNN said, "Number one political story of the year is Trump." You know what number two was? ISIS - ISIS was two. I'd rather reverse it. Let ISIS be one; let me be two, because I want to knock the hell out of them and make me number one next year.

 Make me number one next year. But this reporter, who is a great intellect, actually, and a very smart guy, very good guy. He said - he said, "What you've done has never been done before in the history of this country." Newt Gingrich was on a television show the other say, and said, "This is one the great phenomenons (ph) I've ever seen in politics; nobody's ever seen it."
 Crowds like this? Forget it. I mean, it's only confined to this (inaudible). Again, they sent 3,000 people home. Can you believe it? More than 3,000. It's - it's unbelievable what's happening. It's beautiful what's happening. It's beautiful what's happening. But Newt Gingrich said he's never seen anything like this.
 But he said to me, the reporter, he said, "never been done before." I said, "Well, you know, it's fine, but if I don't win, it's just a waste of time." He goes, "No, no, no. What you've done is incredible." He said, "Even if you don't win, what you've done is incredible; you've totally changed the landscape of politics."

 No, don't applaud, don't applaud, don't applaud. He said, "You've totally changed the landscape of politics; it's forever going to be different. Your campaign - there's never been anything like it." OK, he was very nice. I said, "You don't understand. You don't understand. If I don't win, I will consider this" - and I mean this - "a total and complete waste of time." I really do.
 So - because we're not going to do anything. It's wonderful. Oh, good, I had nice crowds. They'll write about me every once in a while; every two years I'll have a story, "Trump ran this rather good campaign." If we don't win, to me, and honestly you should feel the same thing, if we don't win, it's a terrible waste of time, because you'll have somebody else in there. They won't be able to do what I do. They're not going to be able to. And even if you get one of these Republicans in, like, I didn't finish the - so, the wall.
 When I say "Mexico is going to pay," they all laugh. They all go "heh, heh, heh." They think it's funny. Honestly, these are people - they think it's funny. They're laughing. You know, lightly, like "Oh ho, that's so funny; ha, ha, ha." They're going to pay for the wall, folks. They're making billions and billions and billions of dollars on deficits that we have with Mexico. The wall is peanuts. They're going to pay for the wall.
 But I mention it, now they don't laugh because they're starting to agree with me. And then the other day, one of the people said - it was Ted Cruz, who is a nice guy. But he said, "We're going to build a wall at the southern border." I said, "Look" - and my wife is sitting (inaudible) - where did that come from, right? No, Ted's a good guy.
 But he said on one of - I think it was on Fox, he was being interviewed. And he said, "We're going to build a wall at the southern border." He didn't say Mexico was going to pay was going to pay. He hasn't gone that far yet, but believe me that's going to happen. See, they're all trying to catch up with me. Because when I did this stuff, it was very out there.
 Now, I'm the one that everybody wants to sort of aspire to. But what happens is - so Ted's up and he's talking. And, you know, routinely we're going to have the border; we're going to have this and that. And we're going to build a wall.
 My wife is sitting there. She says, "Darling, did you hear that? He just said they're going to build a wall. That's the first time I've - you know, that's what you say." She hasn't heard that from any other candidate.
 OK. So we're going to build a wall. Mexico is going to pay for it. There are so many things we're going to do. But when I - when I started the journey, it was amazing. I came down - it took courage. I went down in to the lobby of Trump Tower, on the escalator with Melania. I have never seen - it looked like the Academy Awards, the press. We have a lot of press here today. They're all live - look at all those live cameras.

 So when I came down - when I came down on the escalator, we came down. And I said, "We're going to do things." And I mentioned illegal immigration. You wouldn't even be talking about illegal - it wasn't even on the radar. Nobody was talking about illegal immigration. Is that right? Now, it's one of the big subjects.
 TRUMP: And that's why - and one of the beautiful polls that came out, and I'm so proud of it, CNN just came out with a poll a couple of, I guess a week ago - 36 percent for Trump; second is 16; third is 14; then 12. So they're way down. But on the economy, they give me 55 - 55 percent. That's with 16 people at the time.

 On the budget, I mean, I understand - the budget, the economy, I win - I win it hands down, all right.
 But listen to this. On illegal immigration, I'm almost at 50 percent.

 And on ISIS, likewise, almost at 50 percent. So people want to be protected, they want to feel safe. They need strength, they need toughness, they need smarts. I don't want to be tough - you know, I know a lot of tough guys but they're not smart, and they're the - they're the easiest. You can be tough, you've got to be smart.
 Let's start smart first. You've got to be smart-tough. You've got to be tough because the world is trying to take advantage of us. So what happens is this. I came out, I started - I did it, I was, oh, that first couple of weeks with illegal immigration and Mexico and all of this stuff. Then Kate was killed in San Francisco and Jamiel was killed in Los Angeles. Jamiel Shaw, an unbelievable young man, was killed, just shot right through the head by an illegal immigrant. Kate was shot by a guy who came in five or six times, shot in the back.
 So many great people. And that's - these are two, so many. And then you have the economy and the jobs that are being lost and people aren't paying taxes and all of this stuff, right? And all of a sudden, people are coming over, and I say the wall and now they're starting to say the wall. We have to be progressive in our thinking. When I say progressive, I mean like smart. I'm not talking progressive like a Bernie Sanders would say, the guy want to tax you. Think of it.

 Think of it. This guy wants to raise your taxes to 90 percent. No, no, think - you'll have to move out of this - I love this area, by the way. I've been here many times. Great golfing area, right? We love it.

 No more golf if Bernie Sanders - no more golf. No, no, you won't have any golf anymore. There won't be - you won't have any money left to be - you'll be paying it in taxes. This guy is a total disaster.
 And I'm not saying that - I'll tell you why. You know, Hillary said well, I'd like to run against Trump, believe me.
 This poor Chuck Todd, Meet the Press. His show is dying and he keeps saying do it, do it, but I never liked it. You know, I just - he never treated me fairly. So I do his show, he gets the highest ratings he's had in years. He went from, like - believe me, I won't even give you the numbers, they were massive, the numbers, right? I saved his life, and then he goes Hillary Clinton said that she would most like to run against Donald Trump. And yes - and they're looking forward to it. Trust me, the last person - she's already gotten a dose last night, do you agree?
 AUDIENCE: Yeah!
 TRUMP: She had a tough night. She had a tough one. She had a tough night looking at the beauty pageant, OK?

 So Hillary Clinton said - and here's Chuck Todd - and he's a nice guy. I'm not trying to knock him. Please don't be insulted, Chuck. But she says she doesn't like him. But he doesn't treat me right. So he goes the Clinton campaign said they'd most like to run against Trump, like I'm some kind of a sap. So I call him and I say Chuck, let me explain something. When they say they want to run against me, that means they don't want to run against me, do you understand that? Do you understand it's reverse psychology.
 They say they want to run against me - first of all, I'm winning and tied in the polls now and I haven't even hit her yet. But look at what happened to all the guys I hit. They're gonzo, they're gone or they're failing badly, OK, and they'll be gone soon.
 But Hillary Clinton - think of it. I say so Chuck, report it like properly. Trust me, they don't want to run against Trump. The last thing she wants in her whole life is - this was only - I did this in, like, 15 minutes what happened to them, because the husband wants to come and she wants to accuse me of things and the husband's one of the great abusers of the world? Give me a break. Give me a break.

 Give me a break. So the last person she wants to run against is me.
 Now here's the story. Look, here's the story. It's very simple. So I announced - and I was talking about trade, I was talking about the wall, I was talking about the borders, I was talking about Obamacare, I was talking about the 2nd Amendment will be saved, by the way. The 2nd Amendment.

 It will be saved. The 2nd Amendment is going to be with us if I'm president. You know, they're doing everything. They want to get rid of the bullets now, they're doing everything they can -
 Think of Paris, think of Los Angeles. Think if you had some guns in Paris on the good side, right? They had no guns. Paris has the toughest guns in the world, folks. And France - I mean, you get caught with a gun, it's - the only one that has guns are the bad guys. So they go in these various places, they called the guy the mastermind. He's a moron. I mean, this guy was a moron. I call him the guy with the dirty hat, right? They got him so good. By the way, the French police did a great job and our Los Angeles police did a phenomenal job. They did a great job.

 Wouldn't it be wonderful if, let's see, this guy right here in front of me, he's a tough guy. This guy with the hat, with the lousy head of hair, but he's a strong-looking guy right here. This guy right there, see? And that one. Wouldn't it be nice if they had a gun on their waist? Somebody. Him, him, him, so that when they - you know what they were doing in Paris? Get over here, boom. Get over here, boom. Your turn, get over here, boom. One hundred and thirty people with more to follow because there are people that are so badly injured right now in hospitals. Other people are going to die.
 Same thing over there. These are people that gave a party in honor of their marriage. There's something going on, folks. It's wrong. They gave them a party. They worked - they gave them a party. She came in on a fiance permit or some nonsense and she was radicalized, and he was probably radicalized by her or he was already radicalized.
 And people knew that they were radicalized and people in the area knew that they had bombs - who the hell doesn't know? You're their next door neighbor. And they didn't want to talk about it. You've got to report these people. We've got a real problem. You've got to report them. No more nonsense.
 They didn't report them, and the reason they didn't is because they don't disagree with them so much. OK? Believe me. It's not because they were afraid. You saw the one who wasn't politically correct to (ph) report them. They didn't want to report them. I mean, give me a break. So we have to change.
 So it started off with me where I was going to talk about trade, I was going to talk about all the things, I was going to talk about the military, building it up. I was going to do all of this, but after Paris and California, and there will be others because they have no fear of us, but after Paris and California, it has totally changed and my poll numbers went up 10 points.
 It's amazing. They went up 10 points. I said, "What, you think it was the debate?" Because I did good in the debate. They said, "No. People view you as a tough cookie that's not going to take this crap." That's what it is.

 And now I talk about protection. I talk about - trust me. The trade - that's so easy for me. I've got the greatest guys in the world. They're going to come in, they're going to do a great job. I'm going to do some myself. I always talk about Ford. They're going to built a plant, $2.5 billion in Mexico. That's not going to happen with me. That stuff is - those deals are no good.
 Ford's leaving. They're closing plants all over Michigan to build a plant in - in Mexico. How the hell does that help us? OK. Who are the people that think this is a good thing for us? And in the meantime, in Michigan and other places, we have plants closing all over the place and they're spending - think about a $2.5 billion - then they're going to sell cars, trucks and parts into the United States, no tax, no nothing.
 I'll say you don't have to pay a tax, folks. And you know what? Ford will say "If I (inaudible) pay a tax, we're going to stay in the United States." I mean, it's very simple.

 It's very simple. How about two weeks ago, Nabisco announced a big - Chicago. They announced they're going to leave Chicago with one of their big plants and they're going to move it to Mexico. What's my statement? We're not eating oreos anymore, right? No more.
 But I don't want this. It's not going to happen. Then they're make - they're going to make product and they're going to sell it into the United States? Not going to happen. It's not going to happen. And by the way, I'm a free trader. I believe - we've got to be smart. I mean, we've got to get something. We don't get anything out of anything. We don't get anything.
 We lose on everything. That Iran deal was a disaster. By the way, think of the Iran deal for one second. I always - and this came to me two weeks ago. I don't know why I didn't think of it sooner. Very disappointed with myself.

 The Iran deal is the worst deal I've ever seen negotiated, OK? I'm wrong. You know what the worst deal is? Iran's a part of that one too. We gave them Iraq. That's even better. Think of it. We gave Iran Iraq. Iran has the biggest - think of it. They're going to have the richest oil - if you go to Iraq, take a look. Among the largest oil reserves in the world.
 We gave them, by decapitating Iraq and then leaving, because frankly, once we did it we should have kept 20,00 troops or something, we give Iraq. So not only did they make a great deal in terms of the Iran deal that we know having to do with nuclear, we also gave them Iraq. We gave them Iraq, that they've been after for 100 years. We handed it to them.
 So now, they have the largest oil reserves among - in the world. That's even better than the original deal. I mean, whoever is representing Iran is doing a hell of a job. OK? If that was a stock, you've got to buy some.
 So we are not going to have deals like that with me. It's not going to happen. We're going to become rich again, we are going to become safe again and we are going to become strong again. And...

 And you're going to remember this moment. This is going to be an important moment for all of us. The one thing I have to say and I have to ask you to do, go out and vote. It's going to be your turn.

 Number three. Remember, it starts on February 1st with Iowa. We go to New Hampshire, then we go to the finals (ph), so three weeks. We've got four weeks to go, and then we have three weeks after we start. No matter what is going on in your life, you have got to out and vote. Because if you don't, it's not going to happen.
 Don't sit back and say, oh, Trump is going to do well. The more we can win by, you know, the more power we have in a sense, because it is like a mandate. But you have got to go out and vote. And I will tell you this. It has been an honor to be here, I love this area, I love the people here. It's been an honor.

 But we will make America great again, I promise. Thank you.




 Thank you for the opportunity to speak to you, and thank you to the Center for the National Interest for honoring me with this invitation. I would like to talk today about how to develop a new foreign policy direction for our country – one that replaces randomness with purpose, ideology with strategy, and chaos with peace.
 It is time to shake the rust off of America's foreign policy. It's time to invite new voices and new visions into the fold.
 The direction I will outline today will also return us to a timeless principle. My foreign policy will always put the interests of the American people, and American security, above all else. That will be the foundation of every decision that I will make.
 America First will be the major and overriding theme of my administration.
 But to chart our path forward, we must first briefly look back.
 We have a lot to be proud of. In the 1940s we saved the world. The Greatest Generation beat back the Nazis and the Japanese Imperialists.
 Then we saved the world again, this time from totalitarian Communism. The Cold War lasted for decades, but we won.
 Democrats and Republicans working together got Mr. Gorbachev to heed the words of President Reagan when he said: "tear down this wall."
 History will not forget what we did.
 Unfortunately, after the Cold War, our foreign policy veered badly off course. We failed to develop a new vision for a new time. In fact, as time went on, our foreign policy began to make less and less sense.
 Logic was replaced with foolishness and arrogance, and this led to one foreign policy disaster after another.
 We went from mistakes in Iraq to Egypt to Libya, to President Obama's line in the sand in Syria. Each of these actions have helped to throw the region into chaos, and gave ISIS the space it needs to grow and prosper.
 It all began with the dangerous idea that we could make Western democracies out of countries that had no experience or interest in becoming a Western Democracy.
 We tore up what institutions they had and then were surprised at what we unleashed. Civil war, religious fanaticism; thousands of American lives, and many trillions of dollars, were lost as a result. The vacuum was created that ISIS would fill. Iran, too, would rush in and fill the void, much to their unjust enrichment.
 Our foreign policy is a complete and total disaster.
 No vision, no purpose, no direction, no strategy.
 Today, I want to identify five main weaknesses in our foreign policy.
 First, Our Resources Are Overextended
 President Obama has weakened our military by weakening our economy. He's crippled us with wasteful spending, massive debt, low growth, a huge trade deficit and open borders.
 Our manufacturing trade deficit with the world is now approaching $1 trillion a year. We're rebuilding other countries while weakening our own.
 Ending the theft of American jobs will give us the resources we need to rebuild our military and regain our financial independence and strength.
 I am the only person running for the Presidency who understands this problem and knows how to fix it.
 Secondly, our allies are not paying their fair share.
 Our allies must contribute toward the financial, political and human costs of our tremendous security burden. But many of them are simply not doing so. They look at the United States as weak and forgiving and feel no obligation to honor their agreements with us.
 In NATO, for instance, only 4 of 28 other member countries, besides America, are spending the minimum required 2% of GDP on defense.
 We have spent trillions of dollars over time – on planes, missiles, ships, equipment – building up our military to provide a strong defense for Europe and Asia. The countries we are defending must pay for the cost of this defense – and, if not, the U.S. must be prepared to let these countries defend themselves.
 The whole world will be safer if our allies do their part to support our common defense and security.
 A Trump Administration will lead a free world that is properly armed and funded.
 Thirdly, our friends are beginning to think they can't depend on us.
 We've had a president who dislikes our friends and bows to our enemies.
 He negotiated a disastrous deal with Iran, and then we watched them ignore its terms, even before the ink was dry.
 Iran cannot be allowed to have a nuclear weapon and, under a Trump Administration, will never be allowed to have a nuclear weapon.
 All of this without even mentioning the humiliation of the United States with Iran's treatment of our ten captured sailors.
 In negotiation, you must be willing to walk. The Iran deal, like so many of our worst agreements, is the result of not being willing to leave the table. When the other side knows you're not going to walk, it becomes absolutely impossible to win.
 At the same time, your friends need to know that you will stick by the agreements that you have with them.
 President Obama gutted our missile defense program, then abandoned our missile defense plans with Poland and the Czech Republic.
 He supported the ouster of a friendly regime in Egypt that had a longstanding peace treaty with Israel – and then helped bring the Muslim Brotherhood to power in its place.
 Israel, our great friend and the one true Democracy in the Middle East, has been snubbed and criticized by an Administration that lacks moral clarity. Just a few days ago, Vice President Biden again criticized Israel – a force for justice and peace – for acting as an impediment to peace in the region.
 President Obama has not been a friend to Israel. He has treated Iran with tender love and care and made it a great power in the Middle East – all at the expense of Israel, our other allies in the region and, critically, the United States.
 We've picked fights with our oldest friends, and now they're starting to look elsewhere for help.
 Fourth, our rivals no longer respect us.
 In fact, they are just as confused as our allies, but an even bigger problem is that they don't take us seriously any more.
 When President Obama landed in Cuba on Air Force One, no leader was there to meet or greet him – perhaps an incident without precedent in the long and prestigious history of Air Force One.
 Then, amazingly, the same thing happened in Saudi Arabia - it's called no respect.
 Do you remember when the President made a long and expensive trip to Copenhagen, Denmark to get the Olympics for our country, and, after this unprecedented effort, it was announced that the United States came in fourth place?
 He should have known the result before making such an embarrassing commitment.

 The list of humiliations goes on and on.
 President Obama watches helplessly as North Korea increases its aggression and expands even further with its nuclear reach.
 Our president has allowed China to continue its economic assault on American jobs and wealth, refusing to enforce trade rules – or apply the leverage on China necessary to rein in North Korea.
 He has even allowed China to steal government secrets with cyber attacks and engage in industrial espionage against the United States and its companies.
 We've let our rivals and challengers think they can get away with anything.
 If President Obama's goal had been to weaken America, he could not have done a better job.
 Finally, America no longer has a clear understanding of our foreign policy goals.
 Since the end of the Cold War and the break-up of the Soviet Union, we've lacked a coherent foreign policy.
 One day we're bombing Libya and getting rid of a dictator to foster democracy for civilians, the next day we are watching the same civilians suffer while that country falls apart.
 We're a humanitarian nation. But the legacy of the Obama-Clinton interventions will be weakness, confusion, and disarray.
 We have made the Middle East more unstable and chaotic than ever before.
 We left Christians subject to intense persecution and even genocide.
 Our actions in Iraq, Libya and Syria have helped unleash ISIS.
 And we're in a war against radical Islam, but President Obama won't even name the enemy!
 Hillary Clinton also refuses to say the words "radical Islam," even as she pushes for a massive increase in refugees.
 After Secretary Clinton's failed intervention in Libya, Islamic terrorists in Benghazi took down our consulate and killed our ambassador and three brave Americans. Then, instead of taking charge that night, Hillary Clinton decided to go home and sleep! Incredible.
 Clinton blames it all on a video, an excuse that was a total lie. Our Ambassador was murdered and our Secretary of State misled the nation – and by the way, she was not awake to take that call at 3 o'clock in the morning.
 And now ISIS is making millions of dollars a week selling Libyan oil.
 This will change when I am president.
 To all our friends and allies, I say America is going to be strong again. America is going to be a reliable friend and ally again.
 We're going to finally have a coherent foreign policy based upon American interests, and the shared interests of our allies.
 We are getting out of the nation-building business, and instead focusing on creating stability in the world.
 Our moments of greatest strength came when politics ended at the water's edge.
 We need a new, rational American foreign policy, informed by the best minds and supported by both parties, as well as by our close allies.
 This is how we won the Cold War, and it's how we will win our new and future struggles.
 First, we need a long-term plan to halt the spread and reach of radical Islam.
 Containing the spread of radical Islam must be a major foreign policy goal of the United States.
 Events may require the use of military force. But it's also a philosophical struggle, like our long struggle in the Cold War.
 In this we're going to be working very closely with our allies in the Muslim world, all of which are at risk from radical Islamic violence.
 We should work together with any nation in the region that is threatened by the rise of radical Islam. But this has to be a two-way street – they must also be good to us and remember us and all we are doing for them.
 The struggle against radical Islam also takes place in our homeland. There are scores of recent migrants inside our borders charged with terrorism. For every case known to the public, there are dozens more.
 We must stop importing extremism through senseless immigration policies.
 A pause for reassessment will help us to prevent the next San Bernardino or worse - all you have to do is look at the World Trade Center and September 11th.
 And then there's ISIS. I have a simple message for them. Their days are numbered. I won't tell them where and I won't tell them how. We must as, a nation, be more unpredictable. But they're going to be gone. And soon.
 Secondly, we have to rebuild our military and our economy.
 The Russians and Chinese have rapidly expanded their military capability, but look what's happened to us!
 Our nuclear weapons arsenal – our ultimate deterrent – has been allowed to atrophy and is desperately in need of modernization and renewal.
 Our active duty armed forces have shrunk from 2 million in 1991 to about 1.3 million today.
 The Navy has shrunk from over 500 ships to 272 ships during that time.
 The Air Force is about 1/3 smaller than 1991. Pilots are flying B-52s in combat missions today which are older than most people in this room.
 And what are we doing about this? President Obama has proposed a 2017 defense budget that, in real dollars, cuts nearly 25% from what we were spending in 2011.
 Our military is depleted, and we're asking our generals and military leaders to worry about global warming.
 We will spend what we need to rebuild our military. It is the cheapest investment we can make. We will develop, build and purchase the best equipment known to mankind. Our military dominance must be unquestioned.
 But we will look for savings and spend our money wisely. In this time of mounting debt, not one dollar can be wasted.
 We are also going to have to change our trade, immigration and economic policies to make our economy strong again – and to put Americans first again. This will ensure that our own workers, right here in America, get the jobs and higher pay that will grow our tax revenue and increase our economic might as a nation.
 We need to think smarter about areas where our technological superiority gives us an edge. This includes 3-D printing, artificial intelligence and cyberwarfare.
 A great country also takes care of its warriors. Our commitment to them is absolute. A Trump Administration will give our service men and women the best equipment and support in the world when they serve, and the best care in the world when they return as veterans to civilian life.
 Finally, we must develop a foreign policy based on American interests.
 Businesses do not succeed when they lose sight of their core interests and neither do countries.
 Look at what happened in the 1990s. Our embassies in Kenya and Tanzania were attacked and seventeen brave sailors were killed on the USS Cole. And what did we do? It seemed we put more effort into adding China to the World Trade Organization – which has been a disaster for the United States – than into stopping Al Qaeda.
 We even had an opportunity to take out Osama Bin Laden, and didn't do it. And then, we got hit at the World Trade Center and the Pentagon, the worst attack on our country in its history.
 Our foreign policy goals must be based on America's core national security interests, and the following will be my priorities.
 In the Middle East, our goals must be to defeat terrorists and promote regional stability, not radical change. We need to be clear-sighted about the groups that will never be anything other than enemies.
 And we must only be generous to those that prove they are our friends.
 We desire to live peacefully and in friendship with Russia and China. We have serious differences with these two nations, and must regard them with open eyes. But we are not bound to be adversaries. We should seek common ground based on shared interests. Russia, for instance, has also seen the horror of Islamic terrorism.
 I believe an easing of tensions and improved relations with Russia – from a position of strength – is possible. Common sense says this cycle of hostility must end. Some say the Russians won't be reasonable. I intend to find out. If we can't make a good deal for America, then we will quickly walk from the table.
 Fixing our relations with China is another important step towards a prosperous century. China respects strength, and by letting them take advantage of us economically, we have lost all of their respect. We have a massive trade deficit with China, a deficit we must find a way, quickly, to balance.
 A strong and smart America is an America that will find a better friend in China. We can both benefit or we can both go our separate ways.
 After I am elected President, I will also call for a summit with our NATO allies, and a separate summit with our Asian allies. In these summits, we will not only discuss a rebalancing of financial commitments, but take a fresh look at how we can adopt new strategies for tackling our common challenges.
 For instance, we will discuss how we can upgrade NATO's outdated mission and structure – grown out of the Cold War – to confront our shared challenges, including migration and Islamic terrorism.
 I will not hesitate to deploy military force when there is no alternative. But if America fights, it must fight to win. I will never send our finest into battle unless necessary – and will only do so if we have a plan for victory.
 Our goal is peace and prosperity, not war and destruction.
 The best way to achieve those goals is through a disciplined, deliberate and consistent foreign policy.
 With President Obama and Secretary Clinton we've had the exact opposite: a reckless, rudderless and aimless foreign policy – one that has blazed a path of destruction in its wake.
 After losing thousands of lives and spending trillions of dollars, we are in far worse shape now in the Middle East than ever before.
 I challenge anyone to explain the strategic foreign policy vision of Obama-Clinton – it has been a complete and total disaster.
 I will also be prepared to deploy America's economic resources. Financial leverage and sanctions can be very persuasive – but we need to use them selectively and with determination. Our power will be used if others do not play by the rules.
 Our friends and enemies must know that if I draw a line in the sand, I will enforce it.
 However, unlike other candidates for the presidency, war and aggression will not be my first instinct. You cannot have a foreign policy without diplomacy. A superpower understands that caution and restraint are signs of strength.
 Although not in government service, I was totally against the War in Iraq, saying for many years that it would destabilize the Middle East. Sadly, I was correct, and the biggest beneficiary was Iran, who is systematically taking over Iraq and gaining access to their rich oil reserves – something it has wanted to do for decades. And now, to top it all off, we have ISIS.
 My goal is to establish a foreign policy that will endure for several generations.
 That is why I will also look for talented experts with new approaches, and practical ideas, rather than surrounding myself with those who have perfect resumes but very little to brag about except responsibility for a long history of failed policies and continued losses at war.
 Finally, I will work with our allies to reinvigorate Western values and institutions. Instead of trying to spread "universal values" that not everyone shares, we should understand that strengthening and promoting Western civilization and its accomplishments will do more to inspire positive reforms around the world than military interventions.
 These are my goals, as president.
 I will seek a foreign policy that all Americans, whatever their party, can support, and which our friends and allies will respect and welcome.
 The world must know that we do not go abroad in search of enemies, that we are always happy when old enemies become friends, and when old friends become allies.
 To achieve these goals, Americans must have confidence in their country and its leadership again.
 Many Americans must wonder why our politicians seem more interested in defending the borders of foreign countries than their own.
 Americans must know that we are putting the American people first again. On trade, on immigration, on foreign policy – the jobs, incomes and security of the American worker will always be my first priority.
 No country has ever prospered that failed to put its own interests first. Both our friends and enemies put their countries above ours and we, while being fair to them, must do the same.
 We will no longer surrender this country, or its people, to the false song of globalism.
 The nation-state remains the true foundation for happiness and harmony. I am skeptical of international unions that tie us up and bring America down, and will never enter America into any agreement that reduces our ability to control our own affairs.
 NAFTA, as an example, has been a total disaster for the U.S. and has emptied our states of our manufacturing and our jobs. Never again. Only the reverse will happen. We will keep our jobs and bring in new ones. Their will be consequences for companies that leave the U.S. only to exploit it later.
 Under a Trump Administration, no American citizen will ever again feel that their needs come second to the citizens of foreign countries.
 I will view the world through the clear lens of American interests.
 I will be America's greatest defender and most loyal champion. We will not apologize for becoming successful again, but will instead embrace the unique heritage that makes us who we are.
 The world is most peaceful, and most prosperous, when America is strongest.
 America will continually play the role of peacemaker.
 We will always help to save lives and, indeed, humanity itself. But to play that role, we must make America strong again.
 We must make America respected again. And we must make America great again.
 If we do that, perhaps this century can be the most peaceful and prosperous the world has ever known. Thank you.


